Title
Review for Payback (1999)
Number of Reviews
40

Author
Steve Kong
Payback is a style-over-substance film and being so it falls into two
distinct categories: the occasional good one that is highly entertaining
or, more often then not, one that completely fails to entertain and realize
only on style to skate by. Which is Payback? And does Payback succeed in
entertaining? 
Porter (Mel Gibson) is a bad guy, a really bad guy. We see how bad he is as
the movie opens. He picks pockets, he steals from the homeless, and he
doesn't tip waitresses. He's not a likeable guy by any means, but he's the
guy we're stuck with throughout the film. Cool! For once we don't have to
follow some ultra-goodie-two-shoes through a film. And this is a nice twist.
So, what's Porter's rub with the world? After robbing some Chinese mobsters
of $140,000 using a car and a big crash, Porter is shot and left for dead
by his partner in crime and best friend, Val (Gregg Henry). Val steals
Porter's $70,000 share of the stolen money. Porter is not dead though and
he is out to get his $70,000, no more, no less. As it turns out that Val is
part of the mob, or as known in the film as "the outfit", but was kicked
out. Val buys himself back into the outfit with the stolen money. Now, not
only does Porter have to deal with Val and the Chinese mobsters, he has the
outfit on his back also. During the film, Porter rekindles a relationship
with a hooker, Rosie (Maria Bello), whom he used to know and she is key to
Porter's plans of revenge.
Gibson doesn't do anything special in Payback. His character Porter is
nothing more than his Lethal Weapon character Martin Riggs gone bad. Gibson
can do this kind of role with his eyes closed; a maniac guy who has no real
care for his life, but has subtle humour within.
There are two performers to look for in Payback: Maria Bello and William
Devane. The last time I saw Bello was on ER last season. She is wonderful
in Payback as the only friend that Porter has. I hope to see Bello in more
films soon. Devane is the best thing Payback has. His onscreen presence is
a hoot and a holler. I wish that he had more screen time because he had one
juicy and funny part. Watch for the scene where he puts on lip-gloss.
Devane takes this scene over-the-top and it turns out to be one of the
funniest scenes in the film.
Payback is the first film helmed by Brian Helgeland who is better known for
his writing: The Postman, L.A. Confidential, and Assassins. He has a steady
hand at directing, but he still needs a bit of work at keeping and
maintaining tone. At times, the film switches tones abruptly and these
switches feel out of place. From time to time the film will go from serious
to humourous, not working its way into the humour. This left the audience,
and myself, unable to catch some of the humour. There are some funny bits
in this film, but they are lost to Helgeland's inability to integrate them
well with the serious portions of the film.
The script by Helgeland and Terry Hayes, based on Richard Starks's book The
Hunter, is nothing special. I do like how snappy the dialogue was, but next
to that, this is just a film about a bad guy getting revenge on bad people.
What makes Payback stick out is the bluish tint that is added to the film
noir look. This bluish tint comes from the process in which the film was
developed. And it is this look that makes up for most of Paybacks style 
the film is a work of art.
One thing that stuck out as strange was Lucy Liu's presence in the film.
She basically takes her character from Fox's Ally McBeal and turns it up a
notch. The sight of her in the film is quite jarring and as I overheard one
audience member say, "That Ally McBeal girl being in this film was corny."
But, it was cool hearing her say, "Hubba hubba."
Payback does succeed in entertaining, though it's mostly pulp
entertainment. The minute you step out of the theatre, most of the film
will have slipped from memory. Catch Payback at a matinee showing to see
the performances of Maria Bello and William Devane. A warningto those who
are weak at the heart, if you're squeamish to violence then Payback is not
for you. There are multiple scenes of heavy and graphic violence. Plus,
there is some graphic torture scenes.
 recipe for a hard boiled review:  one egg, two cups water, a pot,
 a helluva attitude, and a guy who loves the cinema.
 i'm your hard boiled movie guide.

Author
John Smyth
When Porter (Mel Gibson) and his partner Val Resnick (Gregg Henry) rob a 
bunch of Chinese mobsters, the last thing Porter expects is to be left 
for dead, having been double-crossed by Val and shot in the back by his 
wife, Lynn (Deborah Unger). He survives and decides to hunt the two 
down,and get his money back. His task is complicated by the fact that 
there are a lot of other parties interested in the money, not least the 
Chinese, but also a couple of bent cops and a whole syndicate of bad 
guys.
Director Brian Helgeland's career so far has ranged from the excellent
L.A. Confidential to the God-awful Assassins. He has worked with Gibson 
before (on Conspiracy Theory). The film is intended to be a darkly 
humorous and slick thriller, along the lines of Get Shorty, but with 
more violence (The tagline is " Get ready to root for the Bad 
Guy").There are a few problems with this approach. The first is that 
this movie is rather violent, with plenty of killing. Since some of the 
film's punchlines involve somebody dying violently, it makes the average 
viewer a little uncomfortable about laughing at such moments. A subplot 
involving a female sadomasochist offers the audience the opportunity to 
laugh at her taking a beating; a dubious pleasure. 
To say that most of the film's characters are not very smart is an 
understatement - some of the most stupid bad guys ever committed to 
celluloid reside within Payback. Porter wants revenge and his share of 
the money from the Chinese heist. Unfortunately (both for him and almost 
everyone else he meets), Resnick has used to money to pay off a crime 
syndicate which is led by a smooth talking mobster called Carter (played 
as an oily smoothie by William Devane). Carter decides to have Porter 
killed to avoid any problems for his organisation. Porter also attracts 
the attention of a couple of crooked detectives, Hicks and Leary (played 
unsuccessfully for laughs by Bill Dukes and Jack Conly)who want the 
money, and the Chinese mobsters themselves are also hunting Porter 
(whose depiction would be racist except that everyone gets a raw deal in 
this movie).
Porter's various efforts to get his money back are both clever and 
stupid, sometimes both within the same scene. The film also relies 
too much on coincidence (never a good sign in a movie). Raymond Chandler 
(who scripted classics such as The Big Sleep and Double Indemnity) used 
to claim that, whenever he got stuck on a plot detail, he would 'invent 
a body', figuring that he could explain it away later in his story. 
Helgeland seems to have the same approach, but his script lacks the dry 
wit or style of Chandler. 
The film lacks the courage of its own convictions, too. Porter's wife 
is his first target but he doesn't get to kill her (she dies 
accidentally, from a drug overdose). Even his encounter with his former 
partner, Resnick, is more self-defence than cold-blooded revenge. Sure, 
Porter gets to kill a few defenceless people later in the film, but 
since they were really bad guys, the audience doesn't mind so much. 
Gibson seems unsure whether his character is supposed to be sympathetic 
or scary. The result is that he is neither.
I never though I would ever write this sentence but what this movie 
needs is Bruce Willis. Mel Gibson is just not convincing as a ruthless 
gangster obsessed with murder and revenge, and his ability to take 
constant beatings, gunshot wounds and torture recall his adventures as 
Detective Martin Riggs. Willis, for all his flaws, could have played 
this with more tongue-in-cheek.
If Helgeland has taken Point Blank (John Boorman's 1967 classic, with 
Lee Marvin) as his inspiration, the result is, unfortunately, Lethal 
Weapon 5. Not much of a tribute.
Get Your Private, Free Email at http://www.hotmail.com

Author
James Sanford
If you're shocked by the mayhem Mel Gibson perpetrates in "Payback,"
keep in mind that Gibson first rose to international stardom in
director George Miller's "Mad Max" movies, deliriously violent
spectaculars in which the only rule seemed to be "kill or be killed."
In the two decades since, Gibson has mellowed out considerably. True,
plenty of blood has been spilled in the "Lethal Weapon" movies, but
director Richard Donner has upped the levity quotient so much over the
years that last summer's "Lethal Weapon 4" was practically a sitcom
with occasional kung-fu interludes.
The extraordinarily brutal "Payback" could also be seen as a comedy,
albeit an extremely sick and twisted one that offers Gibson the rare
opportunity to play against type. Some of his fans will applaud the
stretch, many will be appalled, and no one should expect a film this
unrelentingly nasty to become a major hit at the box office.
But don't be surprised if, 10 years down the line, "Payback" is hailed
as a minor cult classic. It may be bloody, sleazy and populated
entirely by trashy people, but this picture is also subtly stylish,
sensationally acted and - if you appreciate extremely bitter humor -
pretty funny as well. Somehow, someday, somewhere, "Payback" will get
its due.
Fittingly, at the center of the movie is a guy who's just trying to
get what he thinks he deserves. Porter (Gibson) was swindled out of
$70,000 and left for dead by backstabbing former partners, one of whom
used the money to pay off a debt to "the outfit." Now Porter wants
arefund, and woe to those who stand in his way, be they man, woman or
dog.
In terms of plot, that's about all "Payback" has to offer. What makes
the movie crackle is a cast of powerhouse actors and the vivid colors
in the script by Terry Hayes and director Brian Helgeland.
Porter's wife (Deborah Kara Unger) is a junkie who hides her works in
music boxes and in the hollowed-out heels of platform shoes. The only
thing Porter's ex-friend Val (Gregg Henry) enjoys more than roughing
up others is getting pulverized by dominatrix Pearl (Lucy Liu of "Ally
McBeal").
"Payback" also manages to accommodate a nod to Neil Jordan's memorable
"Mona Lisa," as Porter finds himself drawn to the pricey call girl
Rosie (Maria Bello) he's been driving around town. But the dialogue is
anything but lovey-dovey. "I think all those stories about your being
dead are true," Rosie tells Porter. "You're just too thick-headed to
admit it."
It's juicy stuff, and Helgeland demonstrates a terrific feel for the
material.  "Payback" has been shot in a cool blue tint that makes it
seem like a snapshot from the past, an effect enhanced by disorienting
backgrounds that include New Jersey commuter trains alongside Chicago
street signs.
It's already been widely reported that the primary reason the release
of "Payback" has been held up for the past six months has been
differences between Gibson and Helgeland over exactly how dark the
movie should be. Not being able to see the original cut, we'll
probably never know for certain what it was like, but it's doubtful it
was any better than this vicious, jolting little amorality play. James
Sanford

Author
Nigel Bridgeman
Starring: Mel Gibson, Gregg Henry, Maria Bello & David Paymer
Written by: Brian Helgeland and Terry Hayes
Directed by: Brian Helgeland
It is always refreshing to see a superstar actor who gets paid more than
enough to forget about working for a living to want to take a chance and
play a less-than-savoury character as Mel Gibson does in Payback. Of
course, if I was being paid $25 million for one month's work, I'd probably
be willing to take risks as well, but that's neither here nor there.
Payback is based on a novel by Richard Stark (apparently actually Donald E.
Westlake, author of The Grifters, itself a fine crime film) which was also
filmed in the 1960s as Point Blank starring one of the toughest of tough
guys, Lee Marvin. The film opens with Gibson having recovered from being
shot several times in the back, by whom we don't know yet. All we know is
that Gibson, as Porter, isn't a happy chappy and is hellbent on getting the
money stolen from him back, and getting even in the process, no matter what
the consequences.
It turns out that the man he's after is Val (Gregg Henry), his sometime
partner with whom he stole a briefcase full of cash from a gang of Chinese
mobsters. Obviously not having much of a crisis of the soul, Val figures
Porter is dead and goes about using his share of the money to pay off a
debt to his employers. Porter, however, is the sort of man who holds a
grudge and once on his feet, goes about exacting revenge on the
double-crossing Val.
Gibson gives a terrific performance in the sort of role which he was born
to play, that of a slightly unhinged guy who doesn't mind beating up or
shooting people to get what he wants. You probably wouldn't see other
actors in his salary range take such an offbeat, out-of-character role such
as Porter (Jim Carrey won't be doing anything like this in a hurry after
what happened the last time he tried - The Cable Guy, anyone?). Harrison
Ford's idea of playing an unsympathetic character is Presumed Innocent; the
last time Schwarzenegger played a villain was Batman and Robin, which we
won't mention further; and has Stallone ever really played a villain at all?
This is not to say that Porter is a villain, per se. While he isn't the
sort of character you wouldn't want to get on the wrong side of, he's
nothing compared to some of the ones we are forced to watch in countless
bad thrillers and action films where they kill innocent people in the blink
of an eye or execute their right-hand men just to prove how mean they are.
Porter is only trying to get back what is not-so-rightfully his, which in a
way is almost understandable.
Payback is an enjoyable dramatic black comedy-thriller which won't be
remembered as being among Gibson's most important work, but is still one of
the finer films he's done. The only real problem with it is that, while
everything seems to work out in the end, I was left feeling something was
lacking; was that all? The ending looks as if it was tacked on at the last
minute, and the final voice-over doesn't ring true, even though it was used
to good effect elsewhere in the film-noir style the rest of the film
embodies. The film just ends far too suddenly, after a huge build-up in the
penultimate scenes.
A fine film, even though it needs just a little something more to be the
kind of a film that can be recommended without hesitation. Just be ready
for a possible letdown of an ending.

Author
Susan Granger
Mel Gibson's back, and he's grimly determined to wreak revenge, utilizing every bit of firepower and brutality available in this over-the-top 'noir' action thriller that's set in some dank, crumbling, art deco city. Gibson plays a nasty professional thief who was shot in the back left for dead in a garage by a double-crossing partner (Gregg Henry) and deceitful, junkie wife (Deborah Kara Unger) after they successfully heisted $140,000 in cash from Chinese money launderers. But he's alive and determined to pursue his perverse sense of justice, taking on a shadowy, corporate crime syndicate known as The Outfit (Kris Kristofferson, James Coburn,
William Devane) and aided by an old girl-friend (Maria Bello), a high-priced call-girl. All the women in this movie are sleazy and unsympathetic - but, then again, so are all the macho men. There's lot of  fighting, shooting, and endless gratuitous violence - some quite sadistic and graphic, like the industrial pedicure, which involves smashing toes with a sledgehammer, and seeing a person's nose ring ripped out. In fact, the torture, incinerations, slicing and dicing is all there is.  Based on the novel, "The Hunter" by Richard Stark, adapted by Brian Helgeland ("L.A. Confidential," "The Postman," "Conspiracy Theory") and Terry Hayes, and directed by Brian Helgeland,  it's also a re-make of John Boorman's "Point Blank" (1967) which starred menacing Lee Marvin. And Mel Gibson is no Lee Marvin. Basically, Gibson's miscast, delivering a dull, portentous narration and desperately looking for wit where none exists. On the Granger Movie Gauge of 1 to 10, "Payback" is a loud, lethal!
 4. It's what they call "comic book violence" but it's so choppy, cheesy and crude that no one's laughing.

Author
David Sunga
Written by: Terry Hayes and Brian Helgeland, adapted from a Richard
Stark novel
Synopsis:
This is not a thriller so much as an action comedy. PAYBACK opens with a
few narrated words from Porter (Mel Gibson), a smalltime con man and
thief who seems to have all the bad luck in the world. In his loveless
marriage his wife is a drug addicted loser; he has been defeated,
betrayed, and robbed of $70,000, and; the woman he really loves (Maria
Bello) is owned by the mob.
Understandably, Porter becomes slightly obsessed with getting his money
back, and undertakes diabolical and risky adventures to retrieve his
$70,000 from the syndicate. Can a smalltime fish like Porter save
himself and his sweetie from a life of bad luck and crime?
Opinion:
LETHAL WEAPON megastar Mel Gibson is a well known real-life practical
joker as well as an actor with excellent comic timing. In PAYBACK his
talents basically carry the show. It's Mel versus the mob, upping the
ante and explosion level with each seesawing encounter, until Mel
finally gets the last gloat.
Remember the old Roadrunner, Woody Woodpecker or Spy versus Spy
cartoons, where over-the-top cartoon violence is played for laughs? It's
the same principle in PAYBACK, only Woody Woodpecker's laughing victory
gloat is repackaged as the mantra "Hubba hubba hubba."
A few times the escapist humor gets a little overdone and may even seem
bizarre. For example, there are scenes where Lucy Liu plays a beautiful
Asian woman who gets lip-smacking erotic thrills from being punched in
the face (which somehow doesn't inspire too many belly laughs).
Taken as a whole, PAYBACK still manages to package all of the right
buttons for action fans. It's got fisticuffs galore, explosions, action,
trickery, a dame in distress, and a brave, goofy hero outsmarting the
baddies. What more could action fans ask for?
Copyright Š 1999 by David Sunga
This review and others like it can be found at
THE CRITIC ZOO: http://www.criticzoo.com
email: zookeeper@criticzoo.com

Author
Dustin Putman
Directed by Brian Helgeland.
Cast: Mel Gibson, Gregg Henry, Maria Bello, David Paymer, William 
Devane, Lucy Alexis Liu, Bill Duke, Deborah Kara Unger, Kris 
Kristofferson.
1999 - 102 minutes
Rated R (for violence, profanity, sexual situations, and blood).
Reviewed February 6, 1999.
"Payback," Brian Helgeland's inauspicious directing debut 
(coincidentally, he previously penned the award-winning screenplay for 
1997's "L.A. Confidential"), is a wildly uneven and thoroughly 
unpleasant revenge thriller that takes one idea---a movie with non-stop 
violence, death, and villains---and runs with it, or should I say, 
barely manages to crawl away with it.
Mel Gibson, in yet another disappointing picture ("Conspiracy Theory" 
and "Lethal Weapon 4," anyone?), stars as the reprehensible 
villain/hero, Porter, a man who becomes determined to get his 50% share 
of $140,000, which he stole in a robbery, back when his partner-in-crime 
(Gregg Henry) and drug-addicted wife (Deborah Kara Unger) double-cross 
him, shoot him, and leave him for dead. Porter is not dead, 
however---not by a long shot---as he quickly rehabilitates and, along 
with his loyal prositute girlfriend, Rosie (Maria Bello), sets out to 
make everyone involved in the scam pay.
The tagline for "Payback" is, "get ready to root for the bad guy," and 
sure enough, this is true, as pretty much every significant character 
who appears is crooked in some way. I wouldn't have a problem with this 
offbeat detail if the painfully thin story had been of any interest, but 
it wasn't, and therefore, I found myself having an especially laborious 
time investing myself into a wide array of character that have 
absolutely no redeeming qualities whatsoever. No attempt is made to 
flesh the roles into three-dimensional characters, and there are no 
vacant signs that anyone has any sort of humanity in them. Just because 
the protagonist, a "bad guy," is played by Mel Gibson doesn't mean I 
will "root for him," and I didn't. Quite the contrary, every person in 
the movie deserved to die a gory death (although some of them did, 
anyway, just to spice up the dull proceedings).
Since none of the respectable actors in "Payback" actually have human 
beings to play, only one performance managed to stand out. Lucy Alexis 
Liu (of T.V.'s "Ally McBeal"), who plays a spicy S&M dominatrix, 
brightens up every scene she is in, and has a definite flair for comedy, 
something I would have liked to have seen more of, since most of the 
humor fell with a resounding splat. Meanwhile, Gibson, who is perfectly 
fine here, sleepwalks through a role that is not the least bit 
challenging. Unger, who made an impression in 1997's "The Game," is 
surprisingly wasted and it is difficult to see why she took such a part 
since she disappears ten minutes in, and only has two purproses: (1) to 
get high on heroin, and (2) because she plays a key part in an early 
flashback. Finally, Kris Kristofferson appears in a throwaway role 
during the climax, and this unnecessary plot development sticks out like 
a sore thumb (tellingly, he didn't appear in the original cut of the 
film, but was cast when extensive reshoots took place months later).
Like most action movies, the star often takes a licking but keeps on 
ticking. In the course of the 102-minute running time of "Payback," 
Porter is shot three times in the back, hit by a van, beaten up, and has 
his feet smashed with a sledgehammer. And guess what? Not only does he 
survive the whole ordeal, but he is happy-go-lucky in the penultimate 
sequence (and can still walk!), even though he looks like he had 
recently substituted for a punching bag. 
"Payback" is not, in any way, an entertaining film, even though I am 
sure the makers hoped it would be with all the graphic carnage that goes 
on, but take away that violence and what you are basically left with is 
a blank screen. Perhaps director Helgeland would have been smart to 
consider this, so he could have at least added a few worthwhile 
elements, like a fresh storyline and characters whom you could even 
remotely stand to be around for a few hours. 

Author
David Wilcock
Starring Mel Gibson, Maria Bello and Kris Kristofferson
Directed By Brian Helgeland
Running Time: 1 hour 50 minutes
A 'sort of' remake of the Lee Marvin classic Point Blank, Payback is an
overly violent, egotistical vehicle for Mel Gibson. Although the movie
offers some laughs, this film is too hit and miss to be truly enjoyable.
Gibson plays Porter, a 'nice guy' who losers $70,000 to both his wife
(Deborah Unger) and his partner in crime Val (Gregg Henry.) Mr Nice Guy soon
becomes Mr Bad Guy, as Porter deals with the 'Outfit' to get his money back,
meeting a variety of characters along the way.
Payback is a well made enough thriller, with good action and some nice
jokes. Although the film tends to use over the top violence to achieve it's
laughs, this is a enjoyable enough ride. Mel dominates the whole
proceedings, and while he carries the film enough, he's never believable
enough to make a truly bad guy. His 'hard assed' face is all very good, but
when he speaks it's comes off as a low mumble which is irritating. Also,
someone decided a voice over would be a good idea, but it turns out to be
the worst voice over since Bladerunner (1982) with annoying muttering by
Gibson over the proceedings. The rest of the cast fare somewhat better:
Bello is fun as a stereotypical call girl, the only 'good guy' in the movie.
Familiar to viewers of T.V's E.R, Bello is fine on television but fails to
make an impression on the big screen. More fun Lucy Alexis Lu as a
terrifying S &M girl, and Gregg Henry as Mel's psychotic ex-partner. Kris
Kristofferson, a victim of Paybacks infamous re-shoots, is nice and intense,
if underwritten. Finally, William Devane turns in an excellent performance
as Carter, a super slimy crime boss, and James Coburn is fun as a sharp
dressing villain.
The direction by L.A Confidential writer Brian Helgeland is nice, the action
especially done well. Sadly, the 'talky' scenes are boring and long winded,
which slows down the film. This film should be more of an action movie than
the drama it's obviously trying to be. The film is shot in a grainy blue
colour which adds to the gritty feel of it all in an effective way. And it's
also nice to root for the bad guy, although Porters charisma doesn't come
apparent to the last 30-40 minutes of the film, making it somewhat hard to
root for him at the start. In fact, I warmed to the 'proper' bad guys before
Porter. The violence quota is also high, although the very violent scenes
usually use implied, rather than explicit, violence.
There's a cool soundtrack running throughout, and the come uppance of all
the bad guys are enjoyable enough. The last twenty minutes are hugely
enjoyable, a great cat and mouse chase which has an upbeat pace missing from
the rest of the film. And here lies the main problem with Payback: the
pacing is off. This film should be a fast moving, pacy, violent epic, which
instead gets itself bogged down in 'character developing' scenes it doesn't
need. When the violence arrives, it's a breath of relief, and enjoyable. But
then the drama comes back, and so does the boredom.
Payback, therefore, is a worthwhile film, although flawed enough to not make
this a classic. Gibson fans will enjoy it, as there is a _lot_ of Gibson,
and for the rest of us: Payback is a slow thriller which delivers the goods
a little too late. A shame.

Author
Matt Williams
Mel Gibson takes on his most unsympathetic role yet in the action
thriller, Payback. Based on Richard Stark's novel, The Hunter,
previously shot in 1967 as the Lee Marvin thriller Point Blank, Payback
tells the tale of a bad guy out for revenge.  The film doesn't aim high,
but it hits where it counts.
Porter (Mel Gibson) is dead...or so everyone thinks.  He was a skilled
thief, who picked the wrong partners, and was double-crossed.  Shot and
left for dead, he beat the odds and recovered.  Now, he's back...and
looking to get even.
But, can Porter trust those who used to be closest to him? How about
Lynn (Deborah Kara Unger), his wife?  Has she betrayed him for her true
love:  heroin?  Porter's other associates are just as questionable. His
best friend, Val (Gregg Henry), is in cahoots with The Outfit. And then,
there's Rosie (Maria Bello), the friendly prostitute who may have been
the cause of Porter's downfall.
Following his near-death experience, Porter distills all of his
emotional fury into following a strict code of honor.  Those who
betrayed him did it for $70,000, and Porter wants it back.  He's willing
to forget everything for that 70 grand...but he's willing to kill anyone
to get what's coming to him...
Porter is very definitely the anti-hero here.  And though the film is
obviously designed to have the audience root for him, it is made
evidently clear that he's not the nicest guy to be around.  You just
don't want to be on his bad side.  Gibson's performance is top notch,
though, proving that he can carry a film without relying on his charm.
(However, does Gibson have a required torture scene written into the
contract for every film he makes?)
Shot primarily in silvery tones, the film seems drained of color.  The
intent may have been to emulate the cool intensity of Porter's
determination. Or, it may have been an effort to give the film a
black-and-white feel, while still adding sparks of color here and
there.  In either case, the look of Payback is certainly distinctive.
The plot, however, is not so distinctive.  It's a bit slow at the setup,
and requires a few leaps to reach its conclusion.  But, then again,
Payback isn't about a distinctive plot.  It's all about the thrills and
satisfaction of watching a bad guy vigilante with a loose code of ethics
beat up the even badder guys.
And on this level of simple thrills, Payback works like a charm.  It's
not a movie for someone looking for the traditional hero-versus-villain
structure, but anyone seeking a little action escapism will find it
here.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of nearly 700 reviews, and information on over 750 upcoming
releases

Author
David E. Smith
"Payback" - Mel Gibson and some other schmucks
        With an ad slogan like "Get ready to root for the bad guy," it's
clear that "Payback" isn't going to be a happy, uplifting movie. But the
ads do it a terrible injustice; it is downbeat, and has its fair share of 
action, but it's also a thoughtful, dramatic, black comedy.
Mel Gibson is Porter, a crook so straightforward he doesn't even
need a first name. After he and partner-in-crime Val Resnick (Gregg Henry)
commit their latest robbery, Val and Porter's drug-addicted wife (Deborah
Kara Unger) shoot him. Always ready to hold a grudge, Porter comes back
five months later to get his money. Along the way, he has to deal with
crooked cops, drug dealers, and the Chinese mafia, and they all want to
kill him (again). The only person he can trust is a hooker (Maria Bello),
and his only weapons are justifiable revenge and snappy one-liners.
Set in a blue-hued Chicago, a moody soundtrack and Gibson's
periodic voiceovers set the tone and draw the viewer in. Granted, Porter's
certainly not a good guy - he picks pockets, steals from panhandlers, and
generally does things that ensure him a spot on Santa's `naughty' list.
But everyone else in the movie is so much more despicable that you can't
help but think they deserve it.
And what they deserve, they it in colorful detail. People get shot
and beaten; have their toes hit by a sledgehammer; their sons are
kidnapped and their dogs are scarred for life. Not everything is shown
explicitly, but the camera and sound are carefully engineered to make an
impact on the audience nonetheless.
"Payback" largely relies on the strength of its acting to keep the
viewer involved; thanks to Mel Gibson and a strong supporting cast, it
succeeds admirably. Gibson has a knack for playing the witty, violent type
(as he has done in all the "Lethal Weapon" movies, and even in "The Road
Warrior" to some extent), and falls into this role with a professional's
grace. And the bad guys - the real bad guys - are portrayed with similar
skill by people like William Devane and Kris Kristofferson.
The only short shrift is given to the ladies - there are exactly
three of them in the entire two hours, one junkie and two hookers (one
with an almost-comical sadomasochism complex). Beyond that, "Payback" is
an entertaining amorality play, with plenty of redeeming qualities even if
its characters have none.
(This review was originally published in The Capaha Arrow, the student
newspaper of Southeast Missouri State University.)

Author
Jamie Peck
PAYBACK
Reviewed by Jamie Peck
In fact, it'd probably be a safe bet to accuse "Payback" of employing 
nary a nice guy in its complex story. Gibson's Porter character is the 
closest thing to a protagonist it has, and audiences will get the gist 
of his nastiness from the opening on: Not only does he narrate the film 
in the gravelly, low-octave hush commonly associated with the rogues 
gallery, we also get our first glimpse of him as he swipes a cash stash 
from a crippled vet. OK, so this panhandler turns out to be phony - even 
the bit parts aren't sympathetic here - but the point is that this 
Porter guy is someone with a vicious streak you definitely don't want to 
provoke. 
Too late. Gibson starts off "Payback" already in a snit, and an 
understandable one at that. It seems he recently fell the victim of a 
scam at the hands of his duplicitous partner Val (Gregg Henry); Val 
helped Porter pull off a $140,000 heist from the Chinese mob and then 
stabbed - well, shot, if you really wanna know - his buddy in the back, 
leaving him for dead. But heavies rarely go down without a fight, and 
when Porter makes an unexpected recovery some months down the road, he 
hits the mean streets to track down Val and collect his $70,000 cut by 
any means necessary. This is where all the afore-mentioned 
unpleasantness kicks in. 
"Payback" is so deliriously violent that audiences expecting a cuddly 
crime yarn a la the last few "Lethal Weapons" are going to be shocked 
into submission. And speaking of submission, one of the recurring 
vicious plot threads likely to distress unsuspecting viewers involves 
the kinky machinations of an Asian dominatrix named Pearl ("Ally 
McBeal"'s Lucy Liu), a gal who mingles pleasure and pain with malicious 
glee. Like it or not, the supporting cast includes many colorful roles 
like the above, and their featured sidetracks are far more fun to behold 
than Porter's pulpy lust for revenge. As assorted lowlifes, David 
Paymer, James Coburn, William Devane and Kris Kristofferson steal more 
than their share of scenes. 
Much has been made of the fact that "Payback" had quite a troubled 
production schedule - apparently director Brian Helgeland's cut of the 
film did not appease Gibson, or something of the like, and a decent 
amount of new footage was reshot in order to lighten the tone a bit. It 
sort of shows: The first half of the movie is exceedingly dark and 
brooding in ways that are almost distancing, while act two exceedingly 
lets humor (mostly of the black comedy variety) and its star's 
never-fail charm seep into the mix. The hard-to-classify final result - 
you try putting it in the appropriate genre - is dangerously uneven but 
still a decent game of double-crossing and one-upmanship.

Author
James Brundage
Directed by Brian Helgeland (LA Confidential)
Based upon the novel "The Hunter" by Richard Stark
Starring Mel Gibson, David Paymer, Deborah Kara Unger, and Lucy Alexis Lui
 I'm a man of firsts.  I am the first to make strange comparisons, the first
to make a writing style composed entirely of hybridization (my own dubbing
being the "mockingbird" style, after a Tom Robbins simile in his novel
"Skinny Legs and All").  I'm also the first, and probably the last, to
compare Payback to Quenton Tarantino.
 What could a movie like Payback have to do with anything the "the Q" has
ever done?  Could it be that, with no morals and no real point other than
entertainment, with music mixed in that comes from the era which inspires
the writer, that Payback is closest to Tarantino's 1992 debut Reservoir
Dogs?
 You probably disagree.  In fact, you're probably thinking of looking me up
so you can kill me if you're a hard-core Tarantino fan.  But, with Mel
Gibson in the role of Porter, the anti-hero of our strange story, I couldn't
help but be reminded of the moral ambiguity that "the Q" dishes to us.
 As for the plot, it's both simple and incredibly complex.  Porter, quite
literally a man back from the dead, has been plotting revenge for five
months.  Five months ago, he was shot by his junkie wife (The Game's Deborah
Kara Unger, in a minor but very effective role), who was working with Val
Resnik, Porter's former partner, to screw him out of $70,000.  Left for dead
but alive and well, Porter's back with a vengenece.  He's pulling out all
the stops, he's killing anyone who gets in his way, and he's going to get
his money back.
 Along the way to getting Val Resnik, we see Lucy Alexis Lui (Ling of "Ally
MacBeal") in her funniest role yet, a leather-dressed S&M freak that likes
getting beat up... but likes beating up more.  She's as good with the gun as
she is with the whip, and, although all the right-wing conservatives in the
theatre I saw it in were reaching for their nitroglycerin every time she
came on the screen, I was laughing my ass off.
 Porter also hooks up with an old friend (a hooker, as a matter of fact),
gets to beat up David Paymer (who keeps asking "You're not gonna fuckin kill
me, are ya?"), and destroys a suppossedly powerful crime lord while he's at
it.
 Gibson does his usual brown hair-blue eyes Thunder From Down Under spiel,
giving a moderately good performance in a moderately good movie.  He doesn't
endorse positive moral values... in fact, no one does.  In the words of Lori
Petty from Tank Girl "Lock up your children".  Besides graphic violence and
a touch of S&M, the film isn't all that bad though.  Just make sure you
don't send a sociopath in, they may get ideas.
 Like almost any script he delivers (with the exception of The Postman),
Brian Helegand turns out ann unusually dry repertoir of humor while telling
a likeable story.  Also, like his Oscar winning co-written screenplay LA
Confidential, it has characters you love to hate and characters you love to
hate to love.
 I wouldn't say this is action packed, either.  In fact, on the action
scale, it's about a five.  But this film isn't held together by action, it's
held together by the script staccato pace.  The storyline, from the opening
line, grabs you, pulls you in and lets you enjoy what's happenning to you.
 Overall, like Reservoir Dogs, I won't extol it as one of the greatest films
of all time, but, its the best out there.  And it certainly is a damn good
film, too.  See it, you'll agree.  Just make sure you pay the babysitter in
cash.

Author
Homer Yen
Don't mess with Porter (Mel Gibson) because if you do, he'll take
matters into his own hands in a moment's notice.  Don't cross him
because if you do, you're going to feel his wrath.  Don't steal from
him, because if you do, he will stop at nothing to exact revenge.  It
doesn't matter what his obstacles are in his way and it doesn't matter
how well you try to prepare yourself.  This is a man that is extremely
clever, and when he finds you, he'll give you a smirk and coldly pull
that triggereven if it's only for a paltry $70,000.
After a flawlessly executed heist, Porter and his partner, Val (Gregg
Henry), make off with a cool $140,000.  Half of it will be given to
Porter, but in this line of work, double-crosses are not uncommon. 
Although Val made off with the entire amount, his gravest error was
that he left Porter alive.   After recovering, Porter wants his share
and he'll do whatever it takes.  It's time for a little payback.  And
that's what this film is about.  There are no twists or turns.  Porter
wants his money, and the situations that he encounters en route to his
money are rather entertaining.
A couple of things makes this movie entertaining.  Foremost is Gibson,
who looks very comfortable as a bad guy who uses a sordid sense of
cruelty to accomplish his goals.  He's not intimidated by anyone nor
does he show any fear.  In fact, he welcomes danger.  He's just plain
crazy, which makes him fun to watch.  Why risk your life for a mere
$70,000 of money that wasn't yours to begin with? To get what he
wants, he has to outmaneuver corrupt policemen, old enemies, and a
host of hit men.  But he's also believably clever.  So despite the
fact that he gets into situations that are more or less suicidal, he
manages a way to save himself and get closer to payback.  The other is
the sense of style that this film projects.  Written by Brian
Helgeland, who co-wrote `L.A. Confidential,' there are some clever
elements where Porter finds ways of tricking the enemy and
unexpectedly turning the tables on others.   Once the movie sets its
tone, you'll also find humor (believe me, you will) in the absurdity
of the violence (smashed fingers, crushed toes, groin stomping, and
lots of other painful scenes).  The violence is warped in the same
manner that sex was warped in `There's Something About Mary.'  One of
the more amusing (or bent) supporting players was Lucy Liu, who played
Val's psuedo-girlfriend and leather-clad dominatrix.  In one scene,
Porter threatens Val with bodily harm.  Before he can strike him, she
begs Porter to stop and then proceeds to beat him up instead.  When
Val tries to hit her back, Porter points the gun at him and says, `Let
her finish her work.'  If you like this film, you'll discover that you
may have a delightfully cruel sense of entertainment.  I did.


Author
Ross Anthony
Paying homage to the likes of Dirty Harry, Charles Bronson and Starsky and
Hutch ... "Payback" is a "Death Wish" of the '90s. Opening with a late '60s
secret-agent theme and filmed in a grainy bluish hue, the film has a 70's
feel without sticking plastic yellow daisies all over the screen. "Payback"
is packed with 90's twists, action and dialogue; so even though, president
Nixon and a certain Hicks fight are mentioned, you might still miss the
subtle "retro-ness."
Porter (Mel Gibson), a likeable thief, is betrayed by his wife in cohorts
with fellow thief Val (Gregg Henry). Following a successful sting, his
junkie wife Lynn and crime pal Val pop a couple of rounds in Porter's back
whilest fleeing with his share of the take. Months later, Porter exits the
hospital alive, but dead set on squaring the deal. And boy is he sorely
lacking in the patience department.
By now Val is hobnobbing with syndicate heavies after buying his way in with
Porter's money. Val spends his leisure time with Pearl, a tiny Asian
prostitute with an awesome left hook. Pearl's idea of foreplay brings the
battle of the sexes to an all out fist fight. It's shockingly funny.
Porter hooks up with Rosie, an old girlfriend who looks so much like his
wife that you might get a bit confused (so take heed). Rosie knows him well,
"I think the rumors that you're dead are true, you're just too knuckleheaded
to admit it." Porter and Rosie take on the entire syndicate for a scant sum
of 70 grand. All the while, a couple of cops ride Porter's back expecting
that this lunatic is actually going to be intimidated into handing a chunk
of the spoils to them. This and a few other plausibility issues are easily
overshadowed by the powerful and driven Mel Gibson. This movie is packed
with surprises, gunfire and humor; it's a fun action flick you shouldn't
miss.
Grade..........................A-
--
Copyright Š 1999 Ross Anthony, currently based in Los Angeles, has scripted
and shot documentaries, music videos, and shorts in 35 countries across
North America, Europe, Africa and Asia. For more reviews visit:
http://RossAnthony.com

Author
Frankie Paiva
There is only so much star power that you can handle. Several films base their
success on their main star, thinking that they will be a big draw whether or
not the film is any good. I think that this must have been what was on the
minds of the people who created Payback, a new Mel Gibson thriller that
doesn’t really thrill. The public seems to trust Mel when it comes to making
good action movies, after this I wonder if anyone will. What starts out as an
ultra-violent revenge movie ends as an ultra-violent revenge movie with not
much difference in between.
Porter (Gibson, who’s right for the role but can’t pull it off) was
betrayed by his partner and his wife when they all stole $135,000. They leave
him for dead in a parking lot. But Porter is alive and (depending on your point
of view) well, he plans to seek them out, retrieve his $70,000, and get some
good old fashioned revenge. But in order to find the guy, who know works for a
drug lord, he’ll have to kill a bunch of people and a bunch of people will
have to seriously hurt him and all of them do it as if their having fun.
Somehow, (I don’t really get this) they must plan the ultimate plan to get
away from the two corrupt cops that are following them and escape from an evil
guy (Kris Kristofferson) who’s son they kidnap. Will Mel Gibson die? Or will
he overcome the bad guys? Seriously, does anyone not know the answer to those
questions?
Payback is an example of what is wrong with out culture. The film is extremely
violent, but the thing that bothered me is that plenty of that violence
didn’t seem to be occurring for a reason. Another depressing factor of the
film was that everything was shot when it was really cloudy or with no light,
there isn’t one scene in the movie that has an lighting at all. Plus Lucy
Liu’s character, a hooker that’s into S&M isn’t interesting even though
there’s several moments where she could be. She’s basically the only woman
in this that kills a lot of people. I also see no reason why the female
characters were in this film at all because they didn’t bare their chests,
which in this type of movie, seems like the only important thing they could do.
The film played to me as kind of an old detective story, you can kind of sense
Gibson doing a Humphrey Bogart thing as he narrates a lot of the story. But
this film is way too much like Twilight, starring Paul Newman, to be any good.
Female Gibson fans will be treated to only a brief glimpse of his chest in the
shower, this is definitely a guy movie. So, if your looking to see a bunch of
people get killed, punched, have their feet hit with hammers and whips,
spanked, and shot, see Payback which gets * star.
The Young-Uns: Bloody and brutal violence and shooting accompany almost every
scene. S&M sex scenes, heavy smoking, and language also occur. Good Age 17 & Up
A Review by Frankie Paiva
The 12 Year-Old Movie Reviewer
E-Mail me at SwpStke@aol.com
Visit my website at http://expage.com/page/teenagemoviecritic

Author
Dennis Schwartz
PAYBACK (director: Brian Helgeland; cast:(Porter) Mel Gibson, (Val)
Gregg Henry, (Rosie) Maria Bello, (Stegman) David Paymer,(Lynn) Deborah
Kara Unger, (Carter) William Devane,
(Bronson) Kris Kristofferson, (Mr. Fairfax) James Coburn, (Crooked Cop)
Bill Duke, 1999)
What we have, is a very cleverly done film, that is in it for the
box-office and as an entertainment only film, and it should accomplish
both aims, at least, entertainment wise, it is first-rate. It is a good
mindless, violent flick for Americans to take their mind off the more
serious things occuring at the time this movie opened, such as the
political scandal and impeachment hearings involving our Prez and his
lady intern (and, you know how serious that stuff was).
To get into the spirit of the film, you must suspend your belief in
logic and accept this as a hero fantasy story, with the hero being a
tainted one, basically fighting for his own pride and perverted sense of
ethics, as he figures his life is worth $70, 000, that being the figure
he is owed by his partner in crime, Val (Gregg), a sado-masochist, with
no redeeming human qualities, who along with Porter (Mel), has robbed an
Oriental crime family to get the unsavory dough, before he
double-crossed Porter, and supposedly had him killed. But do remember,
the bad hero, is not all that bad, he is Mel, the charming hero of
countless adventure films, a guy who is full of good looks and charm,
someone audiences love to like, and will plunk down their money to see
his films in huge numbers. He also does the voice-over ala noir style,
in a deep laconic voice, you know, like a Sam Spade would do it. The
voice-over reassured me that he will live through the film (that's good,
because knowing him, he will be in every scene of this flick, and
therefore I'm assured that I will be getting my money's worth of Mel.
You see, I don't really care what happens to his character in this
flick, per se, since he is as unreal as the ones you find in the
cartoons. What I care about is being entertained, by golly, golly,
golly, gee !).
PAYBACK rips off the way a noir film is shot and looks, (or maybe, in a
certain sense, pays it homage!!!) and does it with pizzazz. The big city
it chooses for its locale is Chicago, with its tall buildings and el
trains, adding a dark shade to its story. The only thing it fails to
pick up from those great b/w films mood pieces of edginess from the 40s
and 50s, is that their heroes were really underdogs, they were fighting
the system, not out for their own ends and vanity only. This little
difference is easy to ignore, but it is bothersome when I see how close
Mel came to sniffing out the essence of a noir film. But I'm glad to
report, ever so close, but no cigar, tough guy. You just can't imitate
that secret ingredient without being into the real thing. So take your
$70, 000 clams you will extract from "the outfit", and enjoy that money
with the reformed whore with a heart of mush, Rosie (Maria), you both
deserve it. You were both great to look at on screen, you played your
hands well, and most importantly, I enjoyed the film, it had a lightness
to it that made it very appealing.
Needless to say, there was not much to the plot for this stylish film,
but for those of you who want to know the story line, this is a pure
revenge film. Porter after being set-up by his junkie wife Lynn
(Deborah), and Val, who needs a $130, 000 to square things with the
"outfit" and get back into the organization, where he can really get
good money and protection from the mob...The action scenes of this heist
are super. Porter notices that the gang is not wearing their seat belts,
so on their rounds, when they are carrying the loot, he crashes head-on
to them, killing them and then robbing them of the loot. Then Val does
his double-cross, as Porter's wife shoots her hubby, taking all the
money, which happens to be $140, 000. That is why our hero insists on
only getting $70, 000 back, the sum he believes he is ethically owed for
the work he did. This gag lends a much welcomed humor to what could have
been just a pointless actioner. At least, the filmmakers are having fun
with this one, and it shows.
For the remainder of this slick film, Porter is either getting beat up
or doing the beatings himself. In between there are assorted killings
the traditional way, with a heater. But there is also a car full of
mobsters getting blown up and some get blown up via the phone. There is
plenty of action, so don't worry you don't have to think of anything
when you are watching this flick, everything moves at break-neck speed.
A duo of corrupt cops get into the act, one black the other white, very
political correct, I must say. These filmmakers have a great eye for
detail. And there is a sleaze ball drug dealer (Paymer), the one who
sells bad heroin to Porter's dear wife. He turns out to be the man
Porter uses to contact Val upon his return from the dead. Then there is
the Oriental gang, and their interest turns to Porter when they are
tipped off that he robbed them. So, all-in-all, you have a lot of good
action scenes going down, a lot of funny one-liners (I laughed out loud
when Porter said, if I was any dumber I would have become a cop. You
see, Porter is acting very dumb going after the mob and its big bosses,
Kristofferson, Coburn, and Devane). I, especially, liked seeing Devane,
he is a throwback to the old noir foils. There is also an homage scene
or a rip off, which ever you prefer, it doesn't matter to me, when
Porter rips the earring off a drug dealer's ear, taking a chunk of his
ear with it. You can't help remembering Roman Polansky did that in
CHINATOWN, a true modern noir film, a film that caught the essence of
that genre.
The filmmakers are first time director and former screen writer of L.A.
CONFIDENTIAL, Brian Helgeland. The film is based on a novel, THE HUNTER,
by Richard Stark. The film works for all the above reasons, and most of
all it works, because Mel is great for the part.
Š ALL RIGHTS RESERVED   DENNIS SCHWARTZ

Author
Bill Chambers
PAYBACK *˝ (out of four) 
-a review by Bill Chambers ( payback@filmfreakcentral.net )
(Come with me to the casbah--Film Freak Central:
http://filmfreakcentral.net )
starring Mel Gibson, Gregg Henry, Maria Bello, Kris Kristofferson
screenplay by Brian Helgeland and Terry Hayes, based on the novel "The
Hunter" by Richard Stark
directed by Brian Helgeland
Ladies and gentlemen, Payback is the most expensive episode of "The
Equalizer" I've ever seen. 
Gibson plays Porter, a burglar shot and left for dead by his wife
(Deborah Kara Unger, in an all-too-brief cameo) and partner (Henry)
after a successful heist. As a morgue attendant sets about removing
the bullets from Porter's back, Porter miraculously springs back to
life. He makes it his mission, as a walking dead man without a
conscience, to exact revenge on those who screwed him and reclaim his
share of the loot. (In a running gag, Porter demands $70 000, but
everybody mishears him and assumes he's after the entire $130 000
haul.) In his travels (or travails), Porter encounters several other
one-named villainous cretins like Fairfax (James Coburn as a
white-haired, millionaire thief) and Carter (Kristofferson, as a
brown-haired, millionaire thief-the kingpin of the obligatory
"operation"). 
Helgeland's film (which was recut by Mel the Producer) is devoid of an
imperative dime store charm. The novelty of seeing a big movie star
mercilessly dispatching criminals wears off quickly: a) because the
bad guys can only be differentiated by their coifs, and b) because
Mel's schtick doesn't evolve from act one-he's The Terminator
stranded in a plot without a sci-fi hook to keep us interested after
the initial sadistic thrill is gone. Payback should have been called
Playback: it's a 102-minute loop of the same short sequence. (Mel: "I
want my money." Anonymous Villain: "No." Mel shoots gun. Anonymous
villain dies. Mel meets up with his hooker friend (Bello). Second
verse, same as the first.) It's not Porter's single-mindedness that
robs the film of snap, crackle, and pop; as a character who has
already "died" once, he has nothing to lose and so much to gain. The
movie lacks danger. The only thing Porter is in jeopardy of is putting
the audience to sleep.
Payback has a gritty, metallic look to it that also becomes
monotonous; its cinematography would be more appropriate in one of
those bleak urban psychodramas that come out of England every couple
of months. (Director of photography Ericson Core should have been
fired early on for lighting Bello, so va-va-va-voom in Permanant
Midnight, to look like a potato in a Gregg Allman wig.) 
To analyze such mediocrity is to grant Payback far more attention than
it deserves. Perhaps only someone as experienced with
antagonists-as-protagonists as Tarantino-look what he did with the
similar hero-less botched-robbery tale Reservoir Dogs-could have
pulled off this material (a loose remake of John Boorman's Point
Blank). The movie presents us with the conventions of pulp fiction
(all women are femme fatales; even the cops are in on it, etc.) and
crosses them with the conventions of cheesy TV crime melodramas (death
is never in the cards for the main character, etc.) but transcends
neither. 

Author
Steve Rhodes
Like the Energizer bunny, Mel Gibson, as usual, gets beaten to a pulp,
but, with blood flowing everywhere, he just keeps on going and going in
PAYBACK, a smart new thriller by director Brian Helgeland, the
screenwriter for L.A. CONFIDENTIAL.
As a crook known only as Porter, Mel gives a tough but controlled
performance.  Porter will surprise you with unexpected actions and
reactions, but this time Mel never overacts or tries to be too cute as
he frequently does in his LETHAL WEAPON series.  With this restraint
comes the most empathetic acting he has done since RANSOM.
As we meet Porter, he's near death.  On a dirty kitchen table, an
"doctor" is operating on him.  Pouring cheap whiskey over Porter's back
as an antiseptic, the doctor extracts slugs from Porter's back.  The
story concerns Porter's attempt to get back his share the loot from a
robbery, $70,000 to be precise, and he insists on being very precise.
The running joke in the movie is that everyone assumes he wants the
heist's entire take, $130,000, since no one would go through as much
grief as he does just to recover his $70,000 share.
Written by Helgeland and DEAD CALM's Terry Hayes, the movie has the
crisp dialog of a good, old detective movie.  "Good guys are nice,"
Porter tells us in a raspy voice-over.  "You always have to have someone
to take advantage of.  But they always finish last."
Cinematographer Ericson Core provides the film's stunning look.  Core,
whose work was one of the few good parts of the film 187 from two years
ago, gives the images a grimy, seedy look.  The colors have been washed
out so that only the blues remain.  The browns and flesh tones appear to
have been added back in, and shadows bathe every scene.  Chris
Boardman's moody, mysterious music adds to the movie's heavy
atmospherics.
PAYBACK, which has a definite L.A. CONFIDENTIAL feel, creates a sleazy
world of low-rent hoods, flashy big time "syndicate" criminals, drug
dealers, crooked cops and kinky prostitutes.  The screenplay takes
simple setups, like a robbery "hit," and finds ingenious ways to stage
them.
The secret of the movie is the depth of the supporting cast, and the way
the intelligent script is able to make each stand out.  Gregg Henry
plays Val Resnick, Porter's partner and nemesis.  Val's a blonde-headed
wild man, who has many weaknesses, not the least of which is his
proclivity for violent sex.  Lucy Alexis Liu, from the television series
"Ally McBeal," plays a comically tough prostitute named Pearl, who's
more than a match for Val.
Best of all the supporting cast are the higher-ups in the syndicate,
played in delicious, small parts by James Coburn, William Devane and
Kris Kristofferson.  Although totally absent of morals, they live their
respectable, normal lives as if they were investment bankers.  But don't
cross them, or they will shoot you -- or worse.
Like a roller coaster, in which the riders delight in screaming down
every precipitous fall, PAYBACK loves to make the audience grimace.
Porter will get or give a dose of instant pain as the audience
collectively cries out and then falls silent waiting in silent,
subconscious anticipation for the next big drop -- exhausting but fun.
PAYBACK runs 1:44.  It is rated R for strong violence, profanity, drug
use and sexuality and would be fine for older teenagers.
Email: Steve.Rhodes@InternetReviews.com
Web: www.InternetReviews.com

Author
Luke Buckmaster
PAYBACK
Cast: Mel Gibson, Maria Bello, Gregg Henry, James Coburn, Kris
Kristofferson, William Devane, David Paymer, Deborah Kara Unger
Director: Brian Helgeland
Screenplay: Terry Hayes and Brian Helgeland based on The Hunter by
Richard Stark
Reviewed by Luke Buckmaster
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece):
3 stars
"Get ready to root for the bad guy," trumpet Payback's advertising
taglines.  With a mean spirit and a bad temper, Mel Gibson returns to
form in a film that is so nasty it's almost refreshing.  The film's dark
and cynical edge is driven by Terry Hayes and Brian Helgeland's
screenplay (based on The Hunter by Richard Stark), and Helgeland also
directs with a similarly edgy style.  The scripting bears similarities
to Lock, Stock and Two Smoking Barrels in its cleverness and wit; both
films consistently keep themselves two steps ahead of their audiences.
But also like Lock, Stock, Payback's screenplay is responsible for its
only major downfall.  Character and meaning are afterthoughts, whilst
violence and brutality take center stage.
Surprisingly, the film gels quite nicely.  The combination of
Helgeland's hostile direction and Gibson's eccentric title performance
is a winning one.  Gibson especially seems to relish the opportunity of
playing a bad guy.  A really bad guy.
In fact, in the first ten minutes or so of Payback we've already
witnessed Porter (Gibson) take money off a street beggar, steal
cigarettes from a waitress, and take advantage of some poor guys credit
card.  You see, after a money heist, Porter's partner Val (Gregg Henry)
and wife Lynn (Deborah Kara Unger) double cross him - they shoot him in
the back and leave him for dead.  Much to their disgust, Porter soon
makes it known to them that he is indeed live and well, and thirsty for
revenge.  The tough Porter is now even tougher, and he will do
absolutely anything to win back his share of the loot.
I could complain about Payback's lack of heart and emotion, but I guess
that would be missing the point.  No doubt both Brian Helgeland and Mel
Gibson intended to create something different, something that could
separate itself from the many other blood-soaked crime capers.  In that
way, Payback is a success, though that's not to say it is totally
original.  The film borrows bits and pieces from other films and gives a
fresh spin on them.  Although the old cigarette dropped on petrol trick
has been done numerous times before, it seems irresistible when
performed by Gibson.   There is something about watching a cuddly
Hollywood star trapped inside a vividly portrayed world of crime that
immediately captivates.
Although flawed with a script that is too clever for its own good,
Payback provides great light entertainment.  In fact, I was often so
amused by this film that I became frustrated knowing that the inevitable
would come - an ending that really doesn't satisfy.  By the time that
Payback reels through its final few scenes, it is obvious that the film
is too weak on plot and characters to make it a memorable flick.  It is
also obvious, though, that almost all of Payback is immensely enjoyable.
"I saw weird stuff in that place last night.  Weird, strange, sick,
twisted, eerie, godless, evil stuff.  And I want in."  -Homer Simpson

Author
Bob Bloom
Payback (1999) 2 stars out of 4. Starring Mel Gibson.
 A bit of the sadist is needed to really appreciate Payback. Mel Gibson's
latest movie is filled with unlikable people, most of whom come to gruesome
ends.
 And when they are dispatched, you'll probably grin or laugh. Yea, Payback
is a movie for those people who get their entertainment from watching those
police or secret surveillance programs that Fox airs.
 Payback is for those of us who slow down and gape at an accident scene,
secretly hoping we catch a glimpse of a mangled body.
 In its own sick way, Payback has some cartoonish-like charm, and that is
mostly because of Gibson.
 Here he plays Porter, a bad guy, a professional robber who, with his
friend, Val (Gregg Henry), steals $130,000 from some Chinese Mafia types.
 Only Val double-crosses Porter, taking his wife and all the money and
leaving Porter for dead.
 Like most Gibson characters, Porter is like that Eveready bunny - he takes
a lickin' but keeps on tickin'. Porter recovers from his gunshot wounds and
goes after Val, but not for revenge. He only wants his cut of the loot -
$70,000.
 To get his money, Porter takes on the Outfit, a crime organization that
Val used the $130,000 to pay off as a sort of entrance fee.
 Porter, then, keeps climbing the Outfit's chain of command, leaving bodies
in his wake, as he tries to secure what he believes is rightfully his.
 Heck, you gotta admire the man's persistence.
 Payback is a bloody, ultraviolent feature with no likable characters. Even
the cops are corrupt, waiting for Porter to make his score so they can take
the money from him.
 But the script by Brian Helgeland (L.A. Confidential) and Terry Hayes,
based on the novel The Hunter by Richard Stark, keeps you riveted. There's
no let-up in the action as Porter moves from person to person like some
unyielding, unstoppable force of nature.
 And if the plot sounds familiar, it's because it was adapted for film in
the late 1960s' as Point Blank, starring Lee Marvin and directed by John
Boorman.
 Helgeland, making his directorial debut, seems to get some glee in sleaze
and S&M. Val, for instance, is savagely beaten by Pearl (Lucy Liu), a
dominatrix with a mean right and a taste for blood.
 Porter is tortured by having some of his toes slammed by a sledge hammer.
 Helgeland isn't so foolish as to show the toes actually being struck, but
you hear the sounds of bones crunching. And that's enough to make an
impact.
 As Porter, Gibson shows the dark side that's underneath some of his more
heroic characters such as his Lethal Weapon's Martin Riggs. Gibson goes
through the entire film with a scowl on his face as if he swallowed a stale
burrito.
 Henry makes his appearance felt as the conniving Val, while William Devane,
James Coburn and Kris Kristofferson are featured as the higher-ups of the
Outfit.
 Maria Bello, best known for her role on TV's E.R.. plays Porter's love
interest, the stereotyped hooker with a heart of gold.
 Payback is definitely not a date flick. It's mean, dirty, ultra-violent
and devilishly fun. But you may feel a twinge of guilt afterward.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, Ind.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net
Carol Bloom of Bloom Ink Publishing Professionals
3312 Indian Rock Lane  West Lafayette, IN 47906-1203
765-497-9320   fax 765-497-3112  cbloom@iquest.net
Committed to Lifelong Learning through Effective Communication 

Author
Craig Roush
Release Date: February 5, 1999
Starring: Mel Gibson, Maria Bello, Gregg Henry, David Paymer, Deborah
Kara Unger, Kris Kristofferson, Lucy Alexis Liu, William Devane, James
Coburn
Directed by: Brian Helgeland
Distributed by: Paramount Pictures
MPAA Rating: R (strong violence, language, drug and sexual content) 
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1999/payback.htm
In PAYBACK, Mel Gibson has the role of a surly, hulking badass named
Porter. Porter has a unique disposition: he's the bad guy we know and
hate caught in the main role. Already the red flags are going up in the
marketing department -- audiences'll never go for it; they need someone
more noble to cheer for. And what's this? By the end of the movie,
Porter's *still* a badass! Unacceptable. A successful antihero pic,
GROSSE POINTE BLANK had our hero character come full circle and pick up
some respectable virtues by movie's end. But not Porter. Nope. However,
maybe it *is* Porter's stubborn badassedness that helps save this movie. 
PAYBACK needs something to save it, because it doesn't always work.
Porter, essayed in fine form by Gibson, is a master bank robber who
specializes in payroll jobs -- taking large sums of money all at once.
Unfortunately, his partner (Gregg Henry) has double-crossed him, and run
off with Porter's half of their latest score: $70,000. Not only that,
but Porter's girlfriend (Deborah Kara Unger) was in on the double-cross.
So now Porter's got to follow a cold trail back to his money, through a
lethal syndicate of mob heads and crooked cops. 
It's when Porter gets on the trail back to his money that the movie runs
cold as well. Here it loses the upbeat tempo which is crucial to the
movie's sucess, and instead of providing snappy, guns-blazing action, it
lulls into unnecessary segments of development. This isn't good
filmmaking, especially when audiences expect to get a thrill ride.
Fortunately, the slower middle portion is bookended by a great opening
sequence and a nice finishing touch. 
The finishing touch is loaded with irony, and it's just a sampling of
the script's finer moments. Written by Brian Helgeland, who co-wrote the
award-winning script of L.A. CONFIDENTIAL, it includes a number of comic
moments that get the audience in the proper mood to forgive the movie's
slower moments. Helgeland, who makes his directorial debut here, chooses
to try and spice up these slow parts with excessive blood and gore, but
it largely desensitizes the viewer to Porter's mission. It does not
accomplish its task. 
The movie comes in at slightly above average for Mel Gibson's fine
performance in the lead role. He gives a sadistic credibility to Porter,
one that might elude actors of a lesser talent. The supports are all
serviceable, and they're not really asked to do a whole lot in a movie
like this. Largely, the pieces fit together; it's just an odd puzzle to
fit them into, and for this, PAYBACK is a questionable choice. Not to be
seen by the lighthearted movie-goer, it will run its course in the box
office and then reappear as an occasional bachelor party video rental. 

Author
Michael Redman
There's an ancient occult art know as "glamour". Casting a spell of glamour
creates an illusion that hides the truth. The enchantment can make the plain
appear beautiful and a falsehood seem real. Leading practitioners of glamour
in the late Twentieth Century include make-up manufacturers and those guys who
create film previews.
Trailers for "Payback" look like a light Mel Gibson shoot-'em-up -- "Lethal
Weapon 4 1/2". It's not light. Worse, it's not even entertaining. When the
spell of glamour wears off, the truth rears its ugly head and this truth's
name is "tedium".
Low-life crooks Porter (Gibson), wife Lynn (Deborah Kara Unger) and buddy Val
(Gregg Henry) pull off a successful big-time heist. Successful, that is, until
Lynn shoots him in the back. Miraculously Porter survives and he's not happy.
Working his way up the food chain of the crime "outfit," he's looking for his
$70,000. In typical Gibson fashion, he gets battered, bruised, shot, crippled
and keeps on coming.
This isn't an action film. It's a shoot people in the forehead, smash their
feet with a sledge hammer and kick them while they're down film. Then as an
added bonus, they do it some more, but bloodier.
There's a feeble attempt to create a noir atmosphere, but it rarely works.
It's difficult to care. To have an emotional investment in the characters, the
audience has to be able to identify with them. Anyone who can identify with
Porter is certainly not someone I'd invite over for dinner.
The one sympathetic person in the film is Rosie (Maria Bello). Unfortunately
she's a minor character and an overworked cliche: a high-priced hooker with a
heart of gold for her boyfriend.
Remarkably for a movie that's filled with such ultra-violence, it's a dull
experience. Although there are a few bits that will make you cringe, there's a
sameness to nearly every scene. The exceptions feature Lucy Liu as a flashy
S&M dominatrix. These few stylish moments are such stand-outs they feel
stapled on from another film.
Your mileage may vary. My companions gave "Payback" the high praise of "not
horrible". They were wrong: it is.
(Michael Redman has written this column for over 23 years and has almost
recovered from a particularly vicious flu that he didn't enjoy much.
Redman@indepen.com) 
[This appeared in the 2/11/99 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at Redman@indepen.com.]
-- 
mailto:redman@indepen.com
This week's film review: http://www.indepen.com/
Film reviews archive: http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman
Y2K articles: http://www.indepen.com/

Author
Scott Renshaw
PAYBACK
(Paramount)
Starring:  Mel Gibson, Gregg Henry, Maria Bello, David Paymer, Deborah
Kara Unger, William Devane, Bill Duke, Lucy Liu, Kris Kristofferson.
Screenplay:  Brian Helgeland and Terry Hayes, based on the novel "The
Hunter" by Richard Stark.
Producer:  Bruce Davey.
Director:  Brian Helgeland.
MPAA Rating:  R (violence, torture, drug use, adult themes)
Running Time:  102 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     "Get ready to root for the bad guy" trumpets the tag line for
PAYBACK, and for once the marketing people are on to something.  Lots of
action films go the anti-hero route, offering protagonists with
single-sentence motivations who kill at least as many people as the
ostensible villains of the piece.  The assumption is that we'll be on the
side of the star because...well, he's a star.  It doesn't matter how nasty
or brutal Arnold Schwarzenegger or Steven Seagal get -- if they're the
first name on the marquee, they're the ones whose gunplay and fisticuffs
are cheered.
     Mel Gibson is a different case entirely.  There has always been
something genuinely unstable behind his eyes when he wants there to be --
MAD MAX, the original LETHAL WEAPON, CONSPIRACY THEORY -- but also
something genuinely wounded that makes his instability as sympathetic as
it is menacing.  Gibson uses that persona to solid effect as Porter, a
career thief in single-minded pursuit of revenge.  It seems that Porter
was double-crossed by his partner Val (Gregg Henry) after a $140,000
heist, shot and left for dead so Val could square a debt with his
organized crime bosses.  Five months later, Porter is healed and
determined to recover his share of the loot, even if it means taking on
the sociopathic Val, corrupt cops, the Chinese mafia and Val's bosses in
The Outfit.
     Along the way to his goal, Porter encounters plenty of intriguing
characters, which is half the fun of PAYBACK.  Lucy Liu (from TV's "Ally
McBeal") dives into the role of a dominatrix who _really_ enjoys her work;
James Coburn steals his few scenes as a dapper mid-level crime boss; Kris
Kristofferson uses his rasp-and-squint to appropriate effect as The
Outfit's capo di tutti capi.  PAYBACK works in large part because it's not
just Mel Gibson running around shooting and getting shot at.  The whole
atmosphere of the film is bleak and corrupt, from Ericson Core's bleached
cinematography to the cold brick of Richard Hoover's production design.
Though it comes with a dose of humor, it's usually humor of the black
variety, and the film rarely strays far from pulp crime thriller
territory.
     That includes plenty of violence, of course, which is really the main
place where PAYBACK grows wearying.  There's violence, and then there's
_violence_, and then there's PAYBACK, which never shies away from the
roughest rough stuff from the opening scene of un-anesthetized surgery.
Where a slap might suffice, a pistol-whipping shows up instead; where you
might expect a good old-fashioned roughing up, you can count on the
strategic application of a sledgehammer.  Porter's world is certainly a
brutal one, and Porter himself is a brutal guy, but after a while it all
starts to feel like overkill.  You reach the point where you don't need to
see Val beat up a woman and shoot a dog to figure out that he's not too
nice a guy.
     Fortunately, it all comes back to Gibson, whose monomania about his
$70,000 makes just enough sense to keep the plot moving.  There's a bit
too much effort directed towards making Porter seem sensitive through his
relationship with a high-priced call girl (Maria Bello) -- apparently the
result of Gibson's initial dissatisfaction with director and co-writer
Brian Helgeland's relentlessly dark tone -- but it all seems like
unnecessary effort.  PAYBACK only works as entertainment because Gibson
himself conveys all the reason we need to get behind Porter.  If you can
get past all the bloodshed and brutality, you'll find a surprisingly slick
and surprisingly smart action thriller in PAYBACK.  The amazing thing is
that, by all rights, you _shouldn't_ be able to get past it.  Credit
Gibson for giving us the kind psycho you can't help cuddling up to.

Author
Matt Prigge
Writers: Terry Hayes and Brian Helgeland (based on the novel "The 
Hunter" by Donald E. Westlake)
Starring: Mel Gibson, Maria Bello, Gregg Henry, David Paymer, Deborah 
Kara Unger, Lucy Alexis Liu, William Devane, John Glover, James Coburn, 
Kris Kristoferson, Bill Duke, Jack Conley
Like I did with "American History X," I wonder if there's a different 
cut of "Payback," a Director's Cut if you will, that is significantly 
better than the one I saw. As you've probably heard, as it was official 
controversy, both films were subject to re-cuts by each film's 
respective star, and in the case of "Payback," multiple reshoots, 
changing the original cut of the film which either didn't test well with 
said actor, test audiences, or both. But as I also did with "American 
History X," I bet the original cut, though perhaps better, is not 
exactly stupendous. At best, "American History X" was a very good TV 
movie, boasting at least some intensity from its lead actor (Edward 
Norton) if not some truly obvious jabs at contemporary racism (no way! 
racism can transform people into monsters?!). But with "Payback," it's 
at best a really entertaining, silly bad guy flick. The focus of 
"Payback" is, of course, on a "morally corrupt individual" (read: the 
villain, if this was another movie) and his numerous attempts at 
cold-hearted vengeance. Many of the criticisms of "Payback" bring this 
out about the movie: the lead character's completely unsympathetic, the 
movie's too dark and too violent, and it's too bleak. My estimation: 
he's not unsympathetic enough, and the movie's not nearly as dark, 
violent, or bleak as it should be.
My guess why: Mel Gibson, the film's star, who perhaps was not man 
enough to go the distance and make his character a completely repellent 
character. Normal audience members hate to see movies where they have 
conflicting views on the lead character, and they bitch and moan when a 
movie puts them in a position where they are forced to follow things 
from the point of view of a character they are opposed to, for whatever 
reason. The supreme example of this is with "A Clockwork Orange," where 
the lead character is a complete deviant: a thug, a rapist, and a 
self-centered sonofabitch. But because it's his story, because there is 
voice-over narration by him, and because the film puts him in a position 
where instead of him being the torturer, he's the captive, we are forced 
into a peculiar catharsis where we have to wonder if we're supposed to 
like this character or not. Either way, we care about him in some 
capacity, and listening to different people's reactions, including your 
own, is intriguing.
This probably should have happened in "Payback," another film adaption 
of the Donald E. Westlake novel "The Hunter," which was adapted back in 
1967 by John Boorman as "Point Blank," a classic noir film starring Lee 
Marvin which I've not seen but hear it's so cold and bleak that it's 
incredible. The same will not happen for this film: yes, it's very cold 
and bleak and the character is generally a bastard, but it's the things 
that Gibson has added that lessen the edge on the film and make it more 
of a hoot-and-hollering bit of entertainment: the audience laughs 
hysterically at the twists because they're proposterously ingenius. A 
bit with a bomb and a hotel room is only a nice touch because it 
requires skillful manipulation on the part of Gibson's character over 
the rest of the characters, shrewd intelligence that no one else seems 
to have. At one point, he walks into said hotel room, the phone 
mysteriously rings, and he finds the bomb. Next shot is of the bad guys 
who planted it there sitting in their car, and trying to set it off 
again. Suddenly we see someone cutting the fuel tank underneath the car. 
A couple seconds later, we're back in the car, and Gibson is seen 
menacingly through the rear-view mirror, puffing on a cigarette. A large 
lake of gasoline has spread from underneath the car to his feet. He 
drops the cigarette, the car explodes. Audience roars with laughter, and 
maybe some applause.
It's this kind of showmanship that disengages us from the cruelty that 
could be and might very well be the original cut of "Payback." At heart, 
this film yearns to be brutally bleak and questionably immoral because 
it's teeming with villains - there's really not one 100% likable 
character in the movie. The film's plot is even gritty and admittingly 
great: Gibson's character, with the simple moniker of Porter, is a 
career criminal who does a small job with his wife (Deborah Kara Unger) 
and a pal crook of his (Gregg Henry, a greasy DePalma regular) only to 
be shot in the back and left for dead by the two others. He lives, 
though, and when completely rehabilitated, he comes back not just for 
vengeance, but for his cut of the money. His wife is quickly offed via a 
drug overdose (a shame, considering Unger is such an interesting actress 
as evidenced by her performances in "Crash" and "The Game"), but his 
other two objectives are harder to get at. Henry, as it turns out, has 
joined a large crime corportation dubbed "The Syndiacate," and entry 
contained Porter's cut of the money. Not only is Henry harder to get to, 
but now he also has to go through the numerous levels of this Syndicate 
to obtain his biggest objective.
That he's so concentrated on this objective is what's so entertaining 
and so silly about this film. We end up rooting for him not only because 
he's the one dolling out the narration, but because his ambition 
measures head-for-head with his brain, and that he manages to be so 
precise while being so crazy (going head-to-head with this Syndicate for 
a mere 70 grand is a joke in itself). It's a not-bad plot, but let's 
face it: we can't take what he goes through seriously at all since he 
goes so over-the-top in his attack on the corporation, and thus I wonder 
if that other cut is more subtle and more believable, and therefore more 
engaging. Not to say this film isn't engaging: "Payback" is furiously 
entertaining, a showstopper that leaves you with a big stupid grin on 
your face, or at least that was my perception. In short, it's fun. 
Gibson's Porter is weirdly likable, and the opening moments of this film 
are mesmerizing. We see him getting the bullets taken out of him by a 
criminal's doctor, then getting back in the game by stealing a man's 
wallet and spoiling himself, all with a deadpan look on his face, like 
he's not really enjoying himself, he's just being true to his nature.
In fact, Gibson is superb here. With a low, gritty, tobacco-induced 
voice that sounds eerily like the computer in "Alpahville," Gibson plays 
him as a man who doesn't seem to have a real emotion in his body and 
reacts to the doublecross by merely wanting to get his money back, and 
maybe getting vengeance on his traitors as a little bit of extra credit. 
He makes it tough on the audience to really like him, and surprisingly 
enough, Porter doesn't evoke at all his Mad Max character, the antihero 
who has had the soul drained out of him. But then again, there's the 
rest of the film, which tries to make him more sympathetic by 
introducing a romantic interest in the form of a prostitute (Maria 
Bello) whom he comes to for help and becomes interested in. Their 
half-assed potential romance is just that, and it's something I wish had 
been done in a far more subtle, more bleak fashion (I hear "Point Blank" 
reduces their romance to a one-night stand which is far more compelling 
and true to form than the bit in this film). As such, it corrupts the 
film, and makes it seem like Porter is perhaps not being shown in his 
true colors, like he's been distilled for a mainstream audience.
Other parts don't bode too well either: the subplot involving Kris 
Kristoferson as the head of the Syndicate is, yes, entertaining, but 
it's also distracting from what this film should be. Originally supposed 
to be an off-screen Angie Dickenson, Kristoferson's role is there merely 
so that the audience will be whipped into a frenzy by the sheer 
theatrics of the production (meanwhile, William Devane and James Coburn 
as the two sub-heads of the Syndicate, who were in the original cut of 
the film, work nicely). None of this is a bad thing, in particular. I 
really enjoyed "Payback." For what it is, it's a very good flick, a nice 
deterent from the usual Hollywood films that sometimes can't even rise 
to give us any interesting elements, or at least any witty material. 
This film at least has hilarious subplots, like run-ins with crooked 
cops, an incompetent bookie (David Paymer), and a sadistic dominatrix 
(Alexis Liu), all which register well. Its cinematography is exquisite, 
all drained and pale, accenting grays and blues, giving the film a 
wonderful tone that may be the very best thing about this movie. And 
it's never boring or excruciatingly stupid (well...the bit with the dog 
was rather retarded, but ah well...). In short, it's basically 
everything a Hollywood piece of entertainment should be. But should 
films ever merely settle for being a Hollywood piece of entertainment? 
That, of course, is a rhetorical question.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Author
Mark R. Leeper
     Several months earlier Porter (played by Mel Gibson) planned a
clever robbery.  He was supposed to get a cut of $70,000 as his share.
Instead he got nothing but bullets in the back before being left for
dead.  As the film opens he is being treated by the just about the most
nightmarish doctor imaginable.  It is a painful scene to watch and will
not be the last painful scene by a long shot.  It was not easy getting
back on his feet, but now he is and he wants his money.  But the
proceeds of the robbery went to the Syndicate, an organization not
generally known for fast and friendly refunds.  The harder Porter
pushes for his money the harder he is pushed back by people who have
the power to push back.  But Porter is able to counter-punch for every
punch.  Along the way we get amusing portraits of hoods with sado-
masochistic tastes, crooked cops, prostitutes with hearts of gold,
prostitutes who are nothing but greed, and bizarre Mafiosi.  This is a
film with many bizarre characters, not all as funny as the trailers
would have you believe.
     PAYBACK had the potential to be a modern OUTLAW JOSEY WALES if the
lead had held the film together.  But Porter is just not a very well
written character.  Occasionally he is smart but more often he gets out
of trouble by being lucky.  Somebody shows up at just the right time,
or he is just in the right place because he needed cigarettes.  When
someone tries to kill him with a bomb he knows to check just the right
object in the room.  Or over the telephone he hears just the right
background conversation.  And in a fight he hits harder and shoots
straighter than anybody else.  In fact he is saved so often by
contrivances that the story becomes predictable and one rarely has to
watch the film.  We just know he will come out all right even if
painfully the worse for wear.  He is basically Superman and the bad
guys do not know it yet, but they are way over-matched.  The script was
a cooperation between Terry Hayes and Brian Helgeland.  Hayes wrote the
excellent thriller DEAD CALM.  Helgeland (who also directed) wrote the
scripts for L.A. CONFIDENTIAL and CONSPIRACY THEORY.  He also did work
on the script for THE POSTMAN.  PAYBACK itself is a remake of POINT
BLANK (1967).  Here, however, their character's capabilities are just
not very plausible and Gibson cannot carry the film the way Lee Marvin
did.
     Among the familiar faces in all-too-brief roles are William
Devane, James Coburn, and Kris Kristofferson.  Coburn just lights up
the screen.  All three are Syndicate members of various ranks.  David
Paymer is a small-time hood with the wrong friends in the police
department.  Maria Bello of ER plays Porter's friend and confidant.
Ericson Core's camera-work keeps the colors muted, mostly in blues and
grays.  This has much of the emotional impact of black and white
photography, without actually using black and white.
     We have seen before the story of the good-guy crook who plays
hardball with anyone who gets in his way.  For better thrills, the
viewer might want to rent the original POINT BLANK.  This remake gets a
4 on the 0 to 10 scale and a 0 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Author
Akiva Gottlieb
rated R
starring Mel Gibson, Gregg Henry, Maria Bello, David Paymer, Deborah Unger
written by Brian Helgeland and Terry Hayes
based on the novel "The Hunter" by Donald E. Westlake(as Richard Stark)
directed by Brian Helgeland
In the past decade, filmmakers have decided that people want to see
movies that look "cool". And who could blame them? In today's society,
it's all about what's cool and what's not. For a long time, Mel Gibson
has been the poster boy of "cool".  So those executives down at
Paramount probably decided that they should take Mel Gibson and revive
a character known to many readers of crime fiction; a character named
Parker, from the bestselling series by Donald E. Westlake, and make it
into an early '99 movie.  And if that wasn't cool enough, they took
Academy Award winner Brian Helgeland, writer of L.A. CONFIDENTIAL(and,
sadly, CONSPIRACY THEORY) and asked him to direct his first feature
film. And then, just for the "cool" shock value, they decided to load
it up with gruesome action violence(including a scene where a
character's nosering gets ripped out), "cool" faux-Elmore Leonard
dialogue, and dark, silvery lighting. But in the midst of all this
coolness, there was the actual movie. And it's a shame to say that it
is not nearly the sum of its parts.
For one thing Mel Gibson's Porter character is mean, mean, and
mean. The film's tagline, "Get Ready to Root For the Bad Guy" isn't
even the half of it. The loose storyline is that Porter and his former
partner Val(Gregg Henry) worked on a heist in which they got $140,000
to share. Val then double-crosses Porter, and runs off with the cash
and his junkie wife(Deborah Unger), who ends up shooting him. After
"surgery", Porter is out to seek his 70,000 bucks, and he will waste
no time in butchering anyone who doesn't give him what he wants. The
people behind this movie probably thought that Porter was so "cool",
that they forgot that they're not the ones who're gonna be paying to
see the movie. I mean, are we supposed to like this guy? First-time
director Brian Helgeland slums once again with this lowly crime
thriller. Even comic turns from Kris Kristofferson and James Coburn
cannot keep PAYBACK from being nothing more than trash.  Every once in
a while there is a good line, but if you want to see a much better
better version of the same novel, see John Boorman's POINT
BLANK. Throughout PAYBACK, I couldn't help but think of OUT OF SIGHT,
far better and more richly styled than anything in this Mel Gibson
vehicle. I think audiences deserve a movie that earns its coolness.


Author
Berge Garabedian
For more reviews and movie trivia, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Mel Gibson switches costumes with the "bad guy" role, and stars in the
directorial debut of the 1997 Oscar winner for Best Screenplay for L.A.
CONFIDENTIAL (7/10), Brian Helgeland. This film is a remake of John
Boorman's 1967 film POINT BLANK, starring Lee Marvin and Angie Dickinson.
Both scripts were based on the novel by Donald E. Westlake (as Richard
Stark) called "The Hunter".
PLOT:
Porter is a two-bit robber who gets fudged over by his partner and girl.
They take $70,000 from him, and leave him for dead. Having survived, Porter
wants his money back, and is willing to go through anybody to get it,
including the prominent crime syndicate ("outfit" if you like), that
ultimately pocketed the cash from his ex-partner.
CRITIQUE:
Grimy, violent, funny, smoke-filled tribute to bad guys from vintage movies,
this film features another captivating performance by Mel Gibson, in a
radically different role for him, an entertaining story, a distinct
finger-snapping musical score, and an overall fun guy-time at the movies!
Will women like this film? Not sure. I guess it would depend on their
particular taste in film, but I trust that most
raw-meat-eating-cigarette-butt-smoking-cops-and-robbers-loving fellas are
gonna dig on this movie like they do a double-cheeseburger with bacon, mayo
and spit after a few days of nutritional abstinence. I liked this movie
because it was simple-- the man just wants to get his money back, violent--
a few tense moments are sprinkled around this movie, and quite humorous-many
chuckles were heard during the film's funnier twinklings.
The pacing of the movie was also perfectly set, with an original style from
Helgeland, a witty script, and a thump-thumping score, that reminded me of
the film-noir flicks of the old. The actors were all very good in their
roles with many of the secondary characters coming up with wickedly engaging
performances, most specifically Gregg Henry as Gibson's ex-partner and
future nemesis. The movie also contains some shocking and unexpected
moments, a solid if fluffy ending, and some great tunes tossed in for an
extra-crispy flavour on the outside. And for all those who might complain
about the fact that the whole film is essentially filled with "bad people",
none of whom have any redeeming qualities, I must heartily disagree. Within
the context of their "world", this film has many characters who strive for
power, while others fight for the "principle of the matter". Now if you've
ever fought for a principle in any matter, whether it be for a grade in
school which you deemed unfair, a police officer who pulled you over for a
bogus ticket, or a partner who stole $70,000 from you, you should be able to
appreciate Gibson's character within the seedy, underground world in which
he resides.
This movie's tagline totes the "Get ready to root for the bad guy" motto,
and as much as I hate those damn marketing plugs and the word "root", I must
admit that I did find myself engulfed in the world of this guy Porter,
wishing that he would keep kicking mighty ass, slicing the cheese over the
"even worse guys", and chain-smoking and outsmarting folks like it was going
out of style. Hubba-hubba-hubba indeed !!!
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
This film was heavily re-shot in early 1998 at the request of Mel Gibson,
whose Icon Productions produced the movie. This was due to concerns that the
original version, shot in the summer of 1997 by writer-director Brian
Helgeland, hadn't tested well. Word on the street claims that Gibson was
advised to re-shoot sections of the film by friend and action maestro Joel
Silver, producer of Gibson's LETHAL WEAPON films. Anyway, Helgeland resigned
from the picture rather than shoot the new scenes, which were requested by
Gibson and written by co-screenwriter Terry Hayes. Gibson then hired an
unidentified hack to direct the extra footage, or roughly 30 percent of the
final cut.
So what are the reshot scenes? 
(1) all of Kris Kristofferson's scenes
(2) Gibson's torture scene in which his bare toes get hammered
(3) Gibson getting hit by a car and later getting slammed into a pile of
boxes
(4) the bomb-under-the-bed device and the action that results from it
(5) some of the scenes between the Asian dominatrix (Lucy Liu) and Gibson's
betrayer Val (Gregg Henry)
Mel Gibson's dad, Hutton Gibson, moved the family from upstate NY to Sydney,
Australia in 1968 after winning as a contestant on TV's "Jeopardy" game
show. His brother Donald Gibson is also an actor. His sporadic repertoire of
film credits includes three of his more popular brother's films: CONSPIRACY
THEORY, BRAVEHEART and MAVERICK. Mel is about to have his 7th child with his
wife since 1980, Robyn Moore. He is a devout, traditional Catholic.
Three of director Brian Helgeland's screenplays made their way to the big
screen in 1997. THE POSTMAN starring Kevin Costner, L.A. CONFIDENTIAL
starring Russell Crowe and Kevin Spacey, and CONSPIRACY THEORY (5/10) with
Mel Gibson and Julia Roberts.
The man who plays the black cop in this movie is actor Bill Duke. You may
remember him from his roles in early Arnold Schwarzenegger films like
COMMANDO (7.5/10) and PREDATOR (8/10). He is also a director in his own
right, having filmed such films as SISTER ACT 2 and 1997's HOODLUM.
This filmed was tentatively titled PARKER before the name change.
Novelist Donald E. Westlake, whose book this movie is based on, has written
several screenplays including 1987's THE STEPFATHER (7.5/10) and 1990's THE
GRIFTERS (6.5/10).
Co-screenwriter Terry Hayes has also written Mel Gibson films before. He was
the man who penned MAD MAX 2 and MAD MAX BEYOND THUNDERDOME.
Actress Maria Bello is better known for her role as Dr. Anna DelAmico on
television's drama show "ER". Her role was solidified on the show after a
guest appearance on the final three episodes of the third season, marked
with good performances, convinced the producers to ask her back as a regular
for the series.
Actress Lucy Alexis Liu, originally from Queens, NY, graduated from the
University of Michigan with a degree in Asian languages and cultures while
also studying acting, dance and voice. She is fluent in Mandarin Chinese and
practices martial arts, including Kali-Eskrima-silat, which is knife and
stick fighting. She has an ongoing role on TV's "Ally McBeal" as Ling Woo.

Author
Michael Dequina
Immediately after watching _Payback_, the friend with whom I attended the
screening came up with a snappy line: "_Payback_--where the good guys are
bad, and the bad guys are badder!"  Actually, an equally snappy and more
accurate line would be, "_Payback_--where the bad guys are bad, and the
good guys are even worse," for the "hero" of this offbeat and somewhat
amusing action thriller is arguably more evil than the "villains."
His name is Porter (Mel Gibson), a small-time hood who is swindled out of
$70,000 and left for dead by fellow crook Val (Gregg Henry) and Porter's
own junkie wife, Lynn (Deborah Kara Unger).  Of course, Porter improbably
recovers from his two potentially fatal gunshots to the back, and he takes
violent, often murderous, ends to even the score--or, at the very least,
get his $70,000.
Co-writer/director Brian Helgeland (who retains directing credit though
"creative differences" with Gibson prompted him to leave the project before
its completion) plays the rather scenario for a number of darkly
tongue-in-cheek laughs.  After all, who would go through so much
trouble--and take so much punishment himself--for such an absurdly low
figure?  Only someone as disturbed as Porter, whom Gibson plays with the
same manic, slightly off-kilter energy he always brings to his action roles.
Based on the above, _Payback_ sounds much lighter than it is--for all the
humor in it, the film is quite gritty and dark, reflected most obviously in
Emerson Core's often frustratingly grainy cinematography, which casts a
blue-gray wash over the entire film.  _Payback_ is extremely violent; I
would go so far as to say excessively so at certain points.  Even the
gung-ho male action fans who sat next to me were audibly shocked by some of
Porter's extremely brutal behavior--which he gets his own taste of in a
unsettling torture scene involving a sledgehammer.  There are a number of
sadomasochistic touches, courtesy of an Asian-mob-affliated dominatrix
(Lucy Liu, a long way from _Ally_McBeal_).  This brings me to another point
that will surely spark some controversy: the film's treatment of women.  A
touch of misogyny is expected in a macho action picture such as this, but
when the three prominent female characters--who, I might add, are just
about the _only_ females in the film--are two prostitutes (one being the
dominatrix, the other being Maria Bello's gold-hearted hooker/Porter love
interest) and a heroin addict, one could easily see that the fairer sex
gets a far from fair treatment.
One's enjoyment of _Payback_ essentially boils down to one's opinion of
Porter, and, to a certain degree, Gibson himself: depending on your view,
he can come off as either a badass or an asshole, with no in-between.  The
bulk of the audience with whom I saw the film appeared to think the former,
and, being a Gibson fan, I'm with them.  Nonetheless, I never was more than
amused by _Payback_, whose thin story never generates any genuine excitement.
Michael Dequina
mrbrown@iname.com   |  michael_jordan@geocities.com
Mr. Brown's Movie Site: http://welcome.to/mrbrown
CompuServe Hollywood Hotline: http://www.HollywoodHotline.com

Author
R.L. Strong
Paramount Pictures presents an ICON production of a Brian Helgeland film
Mel Gibson  "PAYBACK" Deborah Unger   David Paymer  Bill Duke
Kris Kristofferson   Edited by Kevin Stitt    Music by Chris Boardman
Executive Producer:  Stephen McEveety   Cinematography by Ericson Core
Based on the novel "The Hunter" by Donald E. Westlake
Screenplay by Brian Helgeland & Terry Hayes
Produced by Bruce Davey    Directed by Brian Helgeland
"We made a deal: if she'd stop hooking, I'd stop shooting people. I guess
we were both aiming a little high."
That ending bit of narration sums up the problems of Brian Helgeland's
directorial debut "Payback". In attempting to make an audience friendly
version of Donald Westlake's hard hitting crime novel 'The Hunter'; the
filmmakers have replaced the amoral atmosphere of the story and replaced it
with a quick series of quips and one liners. The end result is a very
brutal and strangely enjoyable film, but one that raises interesting
questions.
Mel Gibson plays Porter a small time hood who we meet as he is having
several bullets removed from his back  by a back alley doctor. In flashback
we learn that Porter and his partner, Val (Gregg Henry) steal $140 from a
Chinese gangster. Getting away with the money, Porter is doublecrossed by
Lynn (Deborah Unger), his wife and Val. As Porter lies bleeding from his
gunshot wounds, Val drops a photograph on Porter, revealing the hood with a
high priced call girl, Rosie (Maria Bello) he was employed by as a driver.
Porter is now on a mission, and that mission is not revenge. He simply is
out to get what is his. What he earned. $70 thousand dollars. And no one is
going to stop him from getting it. After healing his wounds, Porter finds
his ex-wife (widow), Lynn in a flea bag apartment. Strung out on heroin,
Lynn is returning home with her fix, when Porter surprises her from inside.
He violently assaults her, angry at the betrayal but more so with her
addiction. He forces Lynn to lay with him as she suffers the beginning of
withdrawals.
Unfortunately, as Porter sleeps, Lynn manages to get to her fix. When
Porter wakens, he finds Lynn dead from an overdose, the syringe still
imbedded in her artery.
Having gotten some information from Lynn, Porter goes off to find Val. His
source is Stegman (David Paymer), a mousy bookie. Stegman, happens to be
working with two of Chicago's not so finest cops, Detective Hicks and Leary
(Bill Duke and Jack Conley respectively) who determine that Porter must be
in for a big score and decide to cut themselves in on the deal. Add to this
mix, the reappearance of the Chinese hoods who were the victims of the
original heist, and the deck is increasingly stacked against Porter.
Until, that is, he is reacquainted with Rosie (Maria Bello).
"Payback" is an extremely ugly film. There is not one character that is
redeemable. Everyone in this film connives, cheats, kills, tortures and
maims anyone who would get in the way of their money. While this character
trait is base at best, the writers of the script try to humanize these
figures by giving them humorous asides and quick little one liners. It
doesn't work. While the film has humorous moments (this could be the
blackest comedy of all time were it not so imaginatively bright), there is
not one believable character in the film. The story is constructed with a
heavy reliance on a voice over narration in the person of Porter. In some
cases the narration is current, emphasizing a current thought or feeling,
others are spoken in a past tense which leads one to believe that the film
is being told in hindsight. This is one of the many problems with the film,
in that it's hard to feel empathy and suspense for the character when he is
telling you what he is going to do or what his mindset is, before he acts.
First time Director Brian Helgeland, does a very good job of handling this
morale of Mickey Spillane and Raymond Chandler. The basis for the story was
the marvelous  tome, "The Hunter" by Donald E. Westlake, which was filmed
once before as "Point Blank" (1967) with Lee Marvin in the title role. A
comparison of the two films is rather mote at this point, since both films
detail certain morays and cultural identities of their era. What Director
Helgeland is able to do with this current version is make a hip, jovial and
frightening violent portrait of American society collapsing onto itself in
a vile heap of easy money. At this level, "Payback" works as a lurid
magnifying glass. These characters care less about each other than what
they have. Possession is everything. This is pointed out most strongly in a
stomach churning scene of torture, in which Mel Gibson's character has his
toes crushed one by one with a  hammer until he reveals the location of a
kidnap victim. He lies! His health, his well-being is never so important as
his money.
Gibson's performance is topnotch as usual. In what may be the flip side of
his 'Lethal Weapons' character of Riggs, Porter has no affinity for anyone.
In one marvelously constructed scene, Porter asks Rosie why she didn't
leave with him the night they discovered they were in love with one
another. She replies, 'why didn't you take me'?  It shows that these
characters are so immersed in their own guilt and longing that they can
never express they're true feelings or, better yet come to grips with them.
The female leads are fine but are not called upon to do much. To that
extent Deborah Unger fairs the best, having the showier role as Porter's
estranged wife. Her portrayal for a woman at the end of hope is painful to
watch. When Porter comes to get information from her, she asks "Are you
going to kill me?" When Porter replies 'No', she is heartbroken, knowing
that her only salvation is to take her own life.
The standout performance is by Lucy Alexis Liu as the sadistic prostitute,
Pearl. Having developed a reputation for comic timing on the television
series "Ally McBeal", Ms. Liu pulls out all the stops in what may be the
most outrageous performance of the year. Her natural sexiness and comedic
ability raise her scenes to a level that the rest of the film fails to live
up to.
The cinematography by Ericson Core is marvelously conceived and staged.
This is one of the first films is quite a while that actually takes full
advantage of the wide screen. There are scenes, stage in such a way that
both extreme ends of the frame are used. This is going to be one film that
will not translate well to video without the aid of letterboxing.
One side note.. I must make a comment here about the conditions in which I
witnessed the film. On opening night at a local AMC theater. The print was
not in good shape. The color for the first two reels (approx. 40 mins.) was
uniformly dull, with muted color. Also the print developed a slight
greenish tint, almost eliminating any solid red or warm colors.
Furthermore, the print exhibited a problematic focus shift on the right
edge of the screen, where everything went out of focus. And lastly, the
print exhibited several instances of water damage. These showed themselves
as faint, dark horizontal lines that would run down the frame during a
scene. Needless to say, a refund was forthcoming.
But, that aside. What is the final determination of  "Payback". For my
taste, an interesting misfire. This is a film that could have been a
marvelous send up of the crime genre. As it is, it is a nice programmer.
But with a real moral compass to guide it. The film ultimately fails to
achieve its end. And that is, to entertain.
On a scale of 1 to 5, Payback rates 2.
(rated R for sexual situations, profanity, and extreme violence)
Copyright 1999 R.L. Strong
Nothing in this article may be quoted or
re-printed
without the expressed written permission of the author

Author
Nick Amado
Review: Payback
Starring: Mel Gibson, Maria Bello, James Coburn, Gregg Henry, William Devane, David Paymer,  Kris Kristofferson
Directed by Brian Helgeland
Approx 110 min
Payback combines an interesting mix of 50's film noir and 90's
ultra-cool cinema. It has extreme anlges, strange lighting, slow
motion and that gritty true crime feel of the Pulp Fiction
generation. But there is also some carefully placed narration by the
lead and a near black and white feel achieved through lens filters
that makes the entire film look blue. Bright and colorful wouldn't
have made sense at all. There are no redeeming characters in the
film. The hero is a career thief who kills a number of people without
hesitation. The good guy of the group.
Payback is dark, violent and unredeeming, but it was very
exciting. Perhaps what was so great about it was the film's premise; a
fellow who will stop at nothing to take back the $70,000 that was
taken from him. (Stolen money of course.) In today's market, that's
nothing. Most crime films deal in millions, or at least hundreds of
thousands. It was a joke in Austin Powers that a maniac wanted million
dollars in ransom money. Here, Porter (Gibson) wants the money he was
cheated out of. (He and a partner pulled a $140,00 theft and his
partner turned on him. Tried to kill him too, but that's incidental.)
I felt that I always knew where Porter was going from scene to scene,
which was rather interesting. It sounds like that would make it
predictable, which, to a certain extent it was, but it also offered
something much more unique. There is nothing terribly deep to this
character, but he had a drive that I think many people, certainly
myself, could relate to. He wanted what was his, and even though his
life was ruined as it was taken from him, he wanted to make sure that
he got what he worked for, no more, no less. And so as he goes about
this journey, I was quite proud that I was "in" on the plan. Although
he was very clever, he wasn't dealing with some intricate system with
which one must be familiar in order to understand, he was just going
after some thugs who had his money. There is a primal urge kind of
charm to Payback.
It is also interesting to note that mega-star Gibson took ahold of the
film in the editing room. Apparently he was not happy with the
direction in which Helgeland was taking it, so he took hold of the
reins. I would like to have seen how this film was supposed to
unfold. I can only imagine it was rather confusing and convoluted,
perhaps read more like a mystery or susupense. In either event,
Payback was fulfilling enough for me, and if you like tough guy
movies, then you'll like Payback.

Author
Walter Frith
The last time Mel Gibson played anything resembling the heavy in
'Payback' was in 1988's 'Tequila Sunrise'.  That was a soft core
examination of a drug dealer and his relationship with a childhood
friend who became a cop and the film also involved what usually comes
between men to make them enemies---money and a woman.  That film was
easy to resist because its entire running time was equivalent to
watching a slow motion action picture but its characterizations made up
for its flaws.  Perhaps one of the reasons that 'Tequila Sunrise' was a
disappointment was because it was directed by a well known writer,
Robert Towne, perhaps one of the greatest screenwriters of the modern
era.  Towne won an Oscar for perhaps one of the cinema's most complex
screenplays of the modern era---'Chinatown' in 1974.  Towne also does a
lot of uncredited "touch up" work on screenplays that aren't quite right
for other people before and after they go into production.  As a rule,
writers don't translate well into good directors.
What had me nervous about 'Payback' was that it was directed by another
relatively well known screenwriter, at least among movie buffs, Brian
Helgeland.   Helgeland has to his credit another directing job from
1989's t.v. series 'Tales from the Crypt'.  He also co-produced and won
an Oscar for co-writing 1997's 'L.A. Confidential'.  His limited success
so far convinced the studio to let him try his hand at directing and I
was holding my breath.  I exhaled with delight as 'Payback' is one of
the best films released in the second month of the last year of the
twentieth century.  Perhaps an odd description for a film but I hope
1999 lets us leave the decade, the century and the millennium with some
dignity.  Hopefully more than 1998 did.
The characters in 'Payback' are the lowest forms of scum on the face of
the Earth but what's attractive about it is that although Gibson is one
of them, the others are ten times as bad so as the slogan for the film
goes, get ready to root for the bad guy.  Gibson is Porter and along
with a slimy accomplice named Resnick (Gregg Henry), they pull off a
robbery with the aid of Porter's wife (Deborah Kara Unger).  Porter is
double crossed by both of them and seeks to get revenge (and his share
of the money back).
This film does more for the strange art of revenge than most films of
its kind and it's refreshing to watch since revenge is something we've
all wanted at some point in our lives whether we want to admit it or
not.  What makes Porter stand out and more capable than his foes is the
fact that he is a former Marine with the tattoo "USMC" on his arm to
prove it.  There are three crime bosses to contend with (William Devane,
James Coburn, and Kris Kristofferson), a weasel and wannabe big time
criminal (David Paymer) and a mob whose most attractive asset (in looks
only) is a hooker who likes to perform "crotch squash" on men who p***
her off.  Throw in another hooker, this time with a heart of gold, and
two crooked cops, and 'Payback' has all you could ask for in an
entertaining crime story that you feel embarrassed to laugh at but later
are glad that you did.
Perhaps something that I hope a lot of people will notice, is that
'Payback' is not set in the present day.  They don't tell you exactly
when but all of the phones are the old dial-up type, there are a lot of
big gas guzzling cars, a computer is not seen among the businessmen and
the wardrobe also gives it away to a certain extent.  My guess is it's
set in the early 80's.
'Payback' assaults the senses by making a vicious grab for the jugular.
It holds back nothing but portrays the cleverness of one criminal whose
sole purpose is not only to survive but to do it on a day to day basis.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm
For browsers without java enhancement or if you experience problems with
the above link, go to:
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/mainpage.htm

Author
Joe Chamberlain
Starring Mel Gibson; Gregg Henry; Maria Bello; Deborah Unger & David Paymer
In the grand scheme of Mel Gibson movies, Payback was better than Conspiracy
Theory, but not as good as Braveheart or Lethal Weapon. In other words, it's
a decent couple of hours of entertainment, but 20 years from now if a they
compile a list of Mel Gibson's greatest hits, Payback probably won't be on
it.
Gibson plays a crook who gets double crossed by his partner after they heist
a payroll. Mel's partner needed the money to pay off a mob debt. So he puts
a couple of bullets in Mel, leaving him for dead, and goes on to pay off his
creditors. But, Mel isn't dead (it would be a real short movie if he was)
and he certainly isn't happy. To make matters worse, he wants his money back
and is willing to go to any lengths to accomplish this feat. His ex partner
has already used it to pay off the mobsters, so Mel goes after the mob to
get it back.
Payback is often a very violent film. To its credit, there are a few scenes
that could have been very graphic, but the director (I'm not sure which
one -- more about that in a second) made the choice to let the audience use
their imagination instead of subjecting us to the usual gratuitous gore
found in many films. The film appears a bit disjointed in places, which is
understandable considering producer / star Gibson wasn't thrilled with how
the film turned out and wanted parts of it re-shot. When the director
refused, another one was brought in to do the re-shoot. So as a result while
the final product is apparently better than the original (although
personally I would love to see the original version for comparisons sake) it
does get a bit of a choppy feel to it towards the end.
It's always tough to make a film where the main character is a villain,
unless that person has some redeeming qualities. In this case, Gibson's
character has few redeeming qualities. But hey, its Mel, so even when he is
killing people in cold blood we are still rooting for him. My guess is that
if that you put some other Johnny Bananas actor in this role, the audience
would not be quite as responsive. Gibson is Gibson, whether he is playing a
suicidal cop or a stone cold killer, he does a good job. He almost
guarantees that no matter what else happens in the rest of the movie at
least the audience is going to get one good performance. This time out Mel
is surrounded by a good supporting cast, including Maria Bello (as his love
interest), William Devane and Kris Kristofferson (as mod bosses). The man
who steals the show and unfortunately doesn't have a real big part is James
Coburn (as yet another mobster). If I had one big disappointment in this
film, it would be that Coburn didn't have a bigger role.
In the end, Payback is a fairly solid action thriller, just not in quite the
same league as some of Mel Gibson's other work.

Author
Ryan Ellis
        An early winner in 1999 is "Payback". Now, any film with Mel
Gibson taking credit as the star is a pretty solid bet to rake in
a few bucks, but I didn't expect much from this picture. It's
ironic that Mel's character in "Payback" is interested in raking
in a few bucks of his own--all $70,000 of it.
        He stars as Porter (like Madonna or Fabio, it's just a
one-word name), a street hood and petty thief. Well, if you can
call stealing over $100,000 "petty thievery", that is.
Regardless, Porter is essentially a scummy bad guy. Don't forget,
the trailers said to "get ready to root for the bad guy". And
root for him we do.
        Porter's voice-over describing himself and his sleazy little
life sets up the movie in the opening minutes. It's accompanied
by some funky retro music. One of the great aspects of "Payback"
is the soundtrack from the era of rather crappy music--the late
70s and early 80s. They never say when this film is set or even
where, but the rotary telephones, clothes, and bad make-up
indicate that it's from 15 or 20 years ago.
        Anyway, fresh from being stiffed by his cohort in the heist
of $130,000, Porter sets out to retrieve his share of the money.
Naturally, the double-crossing partner doesn't just hand over the
money when they meet. He gave it to "The Outfit" to buy his way
into their mob-like family. If he DID just hand over the money,
the killing spree Porter goes on for the next hour of the film in
trying to reclaim his $70,000 would never have existed and then
where would we be?
        Director Brian Helgeland's screenplay is witty and
revealing.  There's a limited amount of needless wisecracking but
constant development of the main characters, both Mel and Maria
Bello. One of the refugees from "ER", Bello is well-cast as the
hooker girlfriend. She is gorgeous (except for the hideous
eye-shadow) and believable in the role.
        Helgeland, who made his debut in the big chair with this
picture after co-writing an Oscar-winning screenplay for "L.A.
Confidential" in 1997, makes full use of the dialogue and story
and he has to. This is not a beautiful movie to look at since
Helgeland chose to apply a washed-out look. There is nothing
glamorous to show in the world of these slime-balls, but the dull
look doesn't mean it's ever dull to watch. Not since "Pulp
Fiction" have criminals and low-lifes been glorified in such a
wonderful way.
        Some other highlights of "Payback" are a butt-kicking, S&M
lovin' prostitute, several strong supporting performances (from
David Paymer, Kris Kristofferson, and James Coburn among others), and 
that groovy music. Of course, the anchor of this movie is Mel Gibson,
one of the top stars in the entire world. You gotta love the
smarts and finality of the final effects sequence and Mel's
closing lines.
        This film boasts a dizzyingly high death total and most of
the deaths are courtesy of Porter. Still, we're supposed to "root
for the bad guy" and we certainly do.


Author
Greg King
PAYBACK (M).  
(Warner Bros/Village Roadshow)
Director: Brian Helgeland
Stars: Mel Gibson, Gregg Henry, Maria Bello, Kris Kristofferson, James 
Coburn (uncredited), David 
Paymer, Bill Duke, William Devane, Lucy Liu, Deborah Kara Unger
Running time: 104 minutes.
Brian Helgeland, the guy who wrote LA Confidential and
Conspiracy Theory, finally gets the chance to direct, with this
unapologetically tough and amoral crime thriller.
Mel Gibson is largely playing against type as the tough,
repellent anti-hero Porter, a small time criminal who specialises in
payroll heists.  During a payroll robbery, Porter is double crossed by
his wife and her lover and left for dead.  The sleazy Val (Gregg
Henry), who likes his kinky sex with a sadistic edge, owes money to a
shadowy criminal syndicate, known only as The Outfit.
Porter comes looking for vengeance, hoping to recover his half
of the stolen money from Val, who has managed to worm his way back in
with the Outfit.  Porter's quest eventually leads him into an
escalating war with the Outfit and its ultimate supremo Bronson (Kris
Kristofferson, wonderful in a small role).  But Porter has his own
moral code and is only interested in getting his $70,000, whatever it
takes.  "You're doing this for a principle?  For $70,000?" asks an
astonished James Coburn.  "Hell, my suits cost more than that!"
Also caught in the cross fire are the usual underworld low
life denizens, some crooked cops, and Stegman (David Paymer), a slimy
taxi despatcher and small time drug dealer with ambitions to join the
Outfit.  In Porter's world there are no innocent bystanders.  Porter's
only ally is Rosie (ER's Maria Bello), a high priced call girl for
whom he has a soft spot.
Payback is actually a remake of John Boorman's tough and
visually stylish 1967 crime thriller Point Blank, which featured Lee
Marvin.  That film was also again loosely remade in 1974, as The
Outfit, with Robert Duvall playing the role of the vengeance seeking
criminal.  Like its two predecessors, Payback has been based on The
Hunter, a novel written by Richard Stark (a pseudonym used by Donald E
Westlake, when he wanted to break away from comic capers like The Hot
Rock, etc, and write tough, violent, genre thrillers).
And Payback is certainly violent!  Gone is the disposable
comic book like violence of Gibson's Lethal Weapon series, replaced
with a more disconcerting, vicious, callous and gratuitous violence.
Helgeland's direction is certainly proficient and pacy, and he revels
in the graphic blood letting.  Helgeland peppers the film with many
noir like touches, and Payback also has a deliberately old fashioned,
'70's look about it.  Helgeland also adds a touch of dark humour to
proceedings.  He wastes few moments, and his crisp and stylish
direction is the perfect cinematic equivalent of Stark's terse prose.
Gibson was apparently unhappy with the tyro director's
finished film, and reshot about 30%, including the final scenes,
giving Helgeland's original vision a darker tone.  Gibson also brought
in Kristofferson to play the mob boss.
Gibson brings a hard, unforgiving edge and weary quality to
his performance as a ruthless criminal, although his unsympathetic
choice of role here may come as something of a surprise to many of his
fans.  The performances of the supporting cast are solid, with
Kristofferson, an uncredited Coburn, and William Devane oozing smarmy
sincerity as the triumvirate who rule the Outfit.
Although a slickly produced crime thriller, Payback is also
very violent, and one of Gibson's nastier and more disposable efforts.

Author
Nathaniel R. Atcheson
Director: Brian Helgeland
Cast: Mel Gibson, Maria Bello, Gregg Henry, James Coburn, Kris
Kristofferson, David Paymer, Deborah Kara Unger
Screenplay: Terry Hayes, Brian Helgeland
Producers: Bruce Davey, Mel Gibson
Runtime: 102 min.
US Distribution: Paramount
Rated R: strong violence, language, drug use, sex
Copyright 1998 Nathaniel R. Atcheson
I don't like the concept of theatrical trailers:  they give the
audience unrealistic expectations.  More importantly, though, they tend
to mislead viewers.  This is the case with Payback, an intensely violent
and sarcastic film about a man who just isn't nice at all.  The previews
make Payback look like a piece of cynical fluff, in which Mel Gibson
struts around casting one-liners at his leisure, and occasionally
shooting bad guys in a goofy and trivial way.  The previews may get
people in the theater, but at least ten people at my screening left long
before the credits rolled.  So, consider my warning:  Payback is not a
lighthearted Friday night at the movies.  
With that said, I can admit that Payback is not a bad movie.  True, it
is very dark -- director/co-writer Brian Helgeland clearly has an
aversion to overhead lighting.  And it's often ridiculously violent;
aside from a several sadomasochistic sex segments, we get to see
numerous people undergo violent deaths from multiple angles.  And Mel
Gibson gets his feet crushed by a psycho with a framing hammer.  It's
never a pleasant film:  the characters are more reprehensible than
likable, and most of them enjoy inflicting pain on others.  There are
some funny parts, but it's not a funny film on the whole.  Payback is
well-made, but it left me feeling pretty drab.  
The film is based on a novel called The Hunter, which spawned the 1967
film Point Blank.  In Payback, Gibson plays a crook named Porter (don't
ask about his first name).  The film opens with Porter lying unconscious
on a table, as someone removes a couple of bullets from his back with a
pair of pliers.  "Not many people know what their life's worth," he says
in a voice-over.  "I do.  Seventy grand.  That's what they took from me,
and that's what I'm gonna get back."  That statement basically sums up
the entire film:  Porter does everything he can (and with as much
indifference as possible) to get his money back.
There are a lot of colorful characters we get to meet along the way;
the first one is Porter's wife (Deborah Kara Unger), a heroin addict. 
In a flashback, we learn that she betrayed her husband with the help of
a slimeball named Val (Gregg Henry).  In present time, Porter's main
target is Val, but when he learns that the money Val stole went to a
crime syndicate, Porter must travel higher up the ladder, and eventually
deal with the head guy (Kris Kristofferson).  Porter's love interest is
a prostitute (Maria Bello) with whom he has a seedy past.  Other actors
featured in prominent roles are James Coburn (as one of the many crime
bosses) and David Paymer (as a low-life associating with a couple of
crooked cops).
The rules you can use in detecting the fate of a character are as
follows:  1)  if female, she's a hooker or a drug addict, and will
usually end up beaten severely; 2) if male, he's a crime lord or a drug
dealer who will eventually betray Porter (if he hasn't already) and get
shot multiple times or blown to pieces with lots of explosives.  It's
not meant to be pleasant; it is, after all, a crime thriller about bad
people.  But when your "good" guy is the meanest of a group of really
mean dudes, you need to find his one good trait and exploit it.  That's
the main problem with Payback:  I was never given much of a reason to
like Porter.
The problem isn't in Gibson's performance; in fact, he's really quite
good, and plays the character stone-faced and without a glimpse of
sympathy.  He's a burn-out of the worst kind -- the kind who places no
value on human life.  The subplot with his girlfriend is clearly
intended to make him a little more human; Bello is effective in the
female role, but the relationship never really develops and therefore
doesn't resonate the way it needs to.  It's not that Porter is a
loathsome guy:  there are times when he'll win you over.  It's just the
rest of the time, when he simply shoots people because they're standing
in his way, when you'll think twice about really sympathizing with him
and his financial issues.
The preview does promise comedy, and I'll admit that there are a few
scenes that had me exploding with laughter.  One scene, near the
beginning, has Porter staring into a mirror, practicing his smile so he
can fit in with the rest of the human race.  The scene in which Porter
confronts Mr. Fairfax (the Coburn character) is truly hilarious,
especially when Fairfax finds out that Porter just wants $70,000. 
"Hell, my suits cost more than that!" he shouts as Porter makes his way
out.  There's a superb running joke that Porter keeps having to correct
people about the amount of money he wants (everyone thinks it's
$130,000).  And then there's the S&M subplot, featuring a surly Asian
prostitute (Lucy Alexis Liu) that is both hilarious and brutal.  
But when you're not laughing, you'll probably just be cringing from all
the violence the characters endure.  I read that the test screenings had
people saying the film was too dark, and that Helgeland walked away from
the project when the studio ordered that some scenes be re-shot.  I
can't imagine the picture being more dark than it is, but I suppose it's
also possible that Helgeland's original cut made Porter a more likable
guy.  And even though the theatrical trailers make the film look like an
exercise in action-comedy, the final version isn't a complete failure --
it has most of the right elements, and Helgeland does a great job with
style and tone.  But in a movie where the hero is more terrifying than
the bad guys, there better be a darn good reason to like him.  I gave up
trying about half way through.

Author
Jon Popick
Mel Gibson's latest action vehicle is PAYBACK (* ˝), a terribly violent,
terribly choppy film that's, well, just plain terrible.  Armed with the
expectation of seeing Gibson in the rare role of a bad guy, viewers will
instead find every other character so unimaginatively despicable that
Gibson will still emerge smelling like a rose.  But more on that later.
First, a little history
Payback was actually filmed a while ago by first-time director Brian
Helgeland, last year's Oscar winner for Best Adapted Screenplay (L.A.
Confidential) and the writer of Gibson's 1997 action blockbuster
Conspiracy Theory.  Reportedly, Gibson was so unhappy with the finished
product that he convinced the studio to jettison Helgeland out of the
editing room, leaving Gibson to make the final cut himself.  Now, mind
you, this shouldn't be like Jean-Claude Van Damme suddenly gaining
control of a film  Gibson is, after all, an Oscar-winning director
(Braveheart).  But sadly, it is.
Gibson plays Porter, an ex-Marine turned hoodlum that has just scored
$70,000 by robbing a Chinese money-laundering syndicate.  His
heroin-addicted wife (Deborah Kara Unger, The Game) double-crosses him
after the heist, leaving Porter with two ugly bullet holes in his back
while Porter's pilfering partner makes off with all of the loot,
planning to use it to join a mysterious group called `The Outfit.'
In order to get his $70,000 back, Porter starts at the bottom of the
crime world (David Paymer) and works his way to the head of The Outfit
(Kris Kristofferson), meeting many zany characters along the way.  He
also gets back together with Rosie (Maria Bello, Permanent Midnight [and
now 0 for 2 in film since leaving ER]), his girlfriend who also happens
to be a whore controlled by The Outfit.  The only other female in
Payback is an Asian hooker with a specialty in sadomasochism.  So, for
those of you women keeping track at home, that's two whores and a
junkie.  And the three of them are routinely beaten by whichever male
character happens to be in the scene with them.  Hey, you've come a long
way, baby!
Early into the picture, in one of the only pleasing scenes, we see a
beat-up and penniless Porter stealing $3 from a panhandler and parlaying
it into a new suit, a new gun and several hundred dollars by simply
pick-pocketing and leaving lousy tips.  The film is also accented by
Porter's sporadic, gravel-voiced narrations that seem haphazardly thrown
in just to make the awkward scenes blend together better.  There are
also several scenes that run out of sequence; again, probably due to
Gibson's attempt to salvage his project.  For his $20 million fee, he
could have offered to do a lot more.
As an added bonus, every frame of Payback seems to be bathed in blue
light.  You may have seen the style before in television commercials or
your favorite music videos.  I have no idea what this means.  Is it a
metaphor for the cheerless downcasts that the film portrays?  Or is it
symbolic of its crude, distasteful content?  Maybe cinematographer
(Ericson Core, 187) just likes the color blue.  It would have been
better served if used just for the flashback scenes.  Or not at all.
Helgeland also co-wrote the bland script with Terry Hayes, who scripted
Gibson's last two Mad Max films.  It was based on Donald E. Westlake's
novel `The Hunter' which he wrote under the pseudonym Richard Stark.
Helgeland and Hayes should have used pseudonyms as well.  Their story is
as boring as it is formulaic, and its unnecessary graphic violence and
obscenity-laced dialogue often induced my fellow viewers into
uncomfortable laughter and, I swear to God, audible wincing.
Payback and Gibson's Porter are best summed up by the genius that sat
behind me, who, in one particularly ridiculous scene, exclaimed, `Man,
he's whack!'  Whack, indeed.
Payback (1:44) is rated R for graphic violence and lewd language
PLANET SICK-BOY:  http://home.eznet.net/~jpopick/

Author
Edwin Jahiel
PAYBACK ***  Directed by Brian Helgeland. Written by Helgeland and Terry
Hayes, from the novel "The Hunter," by Richard Stark. Photography, Ericson
Core. Editing, Kevin Stitt. Production design , Richard Hoover. Music,
Chris Boardman. Produced by Bruce Davey. Cast: Mel Gibson (Porter), Gregg
Henry (Val), Maria Bello (Rosie), David Paymer (Stegman), Deborah Kara
Unger (Lynn), William Devane (Carter), Bill Duke (Detective Hicks), Kris
Kristofferson (Bronson), Lucy Liu (Pearl), James Coburn - uncredited, et
al. A  Paramount release.110 minutes. R (much violence, kinky sex,
language, dope)
Released at the same time, there's a movie called Simply Irresistible.
Haven't seen it, don't know whether or not it 's irresistible. Mel Gibson,
however, is. This may sound like a gushing fan's judgment, but I don't do
gush and don't do fan. The opinion is objectively supported by the man's
acting record and his versatility. It is buttressed too by Gibson as a
producer, by his directorial debut (and performance) in the overlooked The
Man Without  a Face, his helming of Braverheart (Best Picture Oscar). Then
there's his unexpectedly fine job in the title role of Franco Zeffirelli's
Hamlet.
The now 43-year-old Mel (still quite young by male Hollywood standards) is
an original presence - not only because his wife is expecting their 7th
child!  Offhand, what comes to my mind is a soupcon of Cary Grant-ish
appeal in many performances. Not all of them have been in winner movies,
but there are enough combinations of film and acting to place Gibson in the
constellation.
The two main pillars of Gibson's popularity -- up to Braveheart-- have been
his Australian Mad Max pictures and the American Lethal Weapon series in
which he plays mad cop Martin Riggs. But there's a lot more than just that.
Now his company has made Payback. Mel apparently took a big hand in shaping
it.  It is so violent  and brutal (including gore and torture), so kinkily
sexual (Sadism & Masochism) that perhaps some raters were tempted by an
NC-17. A tricky work to judge. Action fans who love Gibson will applaud.
Fans of just Gibson might say "ho-hum.". Haters of blood and guts;
traditionalists;"nice movie" partisans;  many older viewers, will
doubtlessly stay away.
The plot is simple: a tale of dishonor among thieves and revenge, a
reinterpretation --not a remake-- of the now cultish Point Blank (1967)
which came from the same book by Richard Stark (a pseudonym for Donald E.
Westlake).
Gibson, called Porter (just one name) is a thief and all-around criminal.
He is involved by his pal Val in a violent robbery of Orientals who
regularly carry money for a mob, here referred to as The Outfit. The two
men are aided by Porter's junkie wife Lynn. Lying Val had dangled to Porter
a sum of up to half-a-million  though he knew full well that the gangsters
always carried $140,000. Worse yet, Val and Lynn take Porter's portion and
shoot him dead, or so they think.
Porter improbably survives. The underworld doctor who takes out the bullets
surpasses in shabbiness and filth even the stock figures of earlier crime
movies. He is closer to back-room abortionists.
The penniless, improbably fully healed man, with improbable dexterity picks
a wallet, gets himself money, clothes and other necessities, sets on the
road to recovery. Not of his health (that's a done deal) but of his half of
$70,000, from Val.
Double and triple crosses abound. So do improbabilities. A couple of the
latter can be tolerated in most films, but twenty or more improbabilities
make one huge impossibility. Even so, because of Mel Gibson and the movie's
vigor and momentum, aficionados will put up with big plot-holes and have
some dirty fun following this "guy" flick.
For one thing, Porter narrates the movie in the tough voice-over  style of
earlier (especially 1940s) films noirs, say, like Dick Powell's Philip
Marlowe in Murder, My Sweet. A bonus of this device is to reassure the
audience that the protagonist has survived. For another, there is a quota
of Gibsonisms in jokes and humor of speech and behavior. While some work
and others don't, there is enough irony to keep us going.
Then there's the outrageous dominatrix Pearl (Lucy Liu  of "Ally Mc Beal"),
a high-price call girl and hoodlum associate who gets such high kicks from
S & M that she steals all the scenes she's in.
Porter's journey to recover his 70 grand takes him through a full array of
situations and characters, starting with his stoned-out wife, a
heroin-delivery boy (whose nose ring Porter yanks out (an homage to Jack
Nicholson's slashed nose in "Chinatown"?), a small-timer (nicely weasely
David Paymer), to a black and white duo of corrupt cops (an upending of
Lethal Weapon), to Val and to Val's bosses in The Outfit. Persistent Porter
gets to the hierarchy of the Big Boys.
Amusingly, Porter keeps correcting those who quote him as claiming the full
$140.000. He only wants his half back. Thieve's honor for a change?  Suave
mobster James Coburn, whose chic clothes and luggage gives an extra meaning
to "outfit" is shocked at the modest request. "My suits cost more than
that!" Coburn, smooth and delightful as ever, cringes when Top Man Kris
Kristofferson, for reasons I cannot reveal,  has captive Porter savagely
treated and tells him "I'll make you last for weeks. I'll give you blood
transfusions, if needed, to keep you alive."
The female element is enriched by Rosie, a fancy prostitute connected with
the Outfit,  erstwhile and now again Porter's girlfriend. Though not the
traditional Girl Friday, she assists the man and vice-versa. And her
character implies (but does develop) the distantly Godardian touch that
she's the kind of woman one can rent, but not buy. The saddest moment in
the film for me was when her guard dog got shot in a fracas, but to my
boundless relief, he recovered. Miraculously. Just like Porter.
Mel Gibson plays what is essentially a sociopath, so bloody but unbowed
against all odds that he does get your sympathy. Then again, the sympathy
is continuously distracted by our having to suspend our disbelief. Just
about everything Porter does, he does so well that unbelievability crops up
in scene after scene.
The makers of Payback clearly had the ambition to make a tale for all
seasons. It takes place in an unnamed, fabricated city (much of it shot in
Chicago), in a recent but still unfathomable period. Moody hues  are used.
The composite look of the place and its artifacts, some archaic expressions
of the 1930s, the tone of older Warners or RKO thrillers, modernistic
touches, anonymous contemporary cars but of no discernible decade,
pointedly located dial telephones and more anachronisms will puzzle
audiences that know their cinema.
Director and co-writer Brian Helgeland (b. 1961)  has scripted
L.A.Confidential, Kevin Costner's  The Postman, Conspiracy Theory (starring
Gibson).  Payback is his first big directorial job. Gibson, dissatisfied
with the finished film, made changes, shot new scenes, re-shot extant ones,
added 20 minutes-- partly, 'tis said, to make his role more likable. This
may or may not have added to Helgeland's problems with disconnections, gaps
and loose threads. The result, however, warts and all, has enough
comic-book inventiveness to keep some of us taking it all in, in a silly,
un-bored way.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Author
Curtis Edmonds
by Curtis Edmonds -- blueduck@hsbr.org
"But there is still too much violence on our nation's screens, large and
small.  Too many creators and purveyors of violence say there is nothing
they can do about it.
And there are still too many vulnerable children who are steeped in this
culture of violence, becoming increasingly desensitized to it and to its
consequences and, therefore, as studies show, hundreds of them more liable
to commit violence themselves."  President Bill Clinton
They had the White House Conference of Youth Violence yesterday, or maybe
it was the Summit on School Safety, I forget.  Lots of blather and
well-meaning phrases thrown around by a bucketful of sanctimonious
do-gooding hypocrites, stuffed to bursting with self-regard.  It was all
over the media, of course, plenty of pictures of the Clintons getting all
misty over the thought of the threat posed to America's children by violent
video games and movies.  All sorts of deep-thinking, sensitive quotes like
the one above.  Rubbish.
Payback is not a perfect movie, but it is the perfect antidote to the
current political and social climate.  In a world where violent movies are
reviled and blamed for the ills of our nation's youth, it's refreshing to
see a movie that is unapologetic for its content, straightforward in its
delivery of action and mayhem, courageous in its utter lack of regard for
the effect of the culture of violence on American children.  Payback is a
throwback, a gritty, thoroughly amoral action movie that celebrates all
that is violent and dangerous and mean-spirited. It celebrates only the
manliest of virtues -- self-reliance, grit, determination, stubbornness,
courage, fortitude, and sheer cussedness -- and presents the back of its
hand to sensitivity, gentleness and wimpishness. It has no redeeming social
value, no higher message, no spirit of goodness or decency or honor.
The moral tone of Payback is set in the first few minutes.  The first words
in the screenplay are "G-S-W.  Gun Shot Wound," and there are bunches of
them.  We see people drinking and smoking cigarettes and eating red meat
and not wearing  seat belts and all the other things that real Americans
used to do.  (Payback does demonstrate why you should wear your seat belt,
though.)  Things go downhill from there, morally speaking, with murder and
mayhem and torture and sudden violent death.
Payback is not a film for everybody.  There will be plenty of people, I'm
sure, who will bemoan the level of violence in this movie and wring their
hands over the constant insensitivity and moral deafness of the
characters.  I have a message for these people:  stay home.  Or go watch
Notting Hill or rent Sleepless in Seattle or watch Lifetime.  Payback is a
man's movie, chock-full of action and grit and double-crossing and plot
twists and pain and everything that makes a movie enjoyable.  It is not
pretty, it is not socially redeeming, it is not politically correct, but it
is a hell of a ride.
Payback is Mel Gibson's movie, and Mel makes the movie tick along like the
engine in a 70's muscle car at high rev.  Mel plays Porter, a professional
thief trying to settle a score with his former partner, who stole Porter's
fair share of a heist.  Along the way, Porter runs afoul of the Chinese
Mafia, two crooked cops, his wife, his girlfriend, a sadistic prostitute,
and an assortment of mob bosses, all of whom stand in Porter's way... but
not for long.
What makes Payback work is the innate coolness of Porter.  Porter is the
coolest bad guy since Samuel L. Jackson in Jackie Brown (or Pulp Fiction,
take your pick), but with a more laconic, brutal attitude than Jackson's
smooth jive talk.  Porter is so cool that he makes Fonzie look like Bill
Gates.  .
Coolness is like the Supreme Court's definition of pornography:  difficult
to define, but we know it when we see it.  Take this scene:  a group of mob
bosses are staking out Porter's motel room in a big, flashy car.  Porter
sneaks under the car, cuts the gas line, and then stands behind the car
just long enough for the mob driver to see him.  And then slowly, he drops
his lit cigarette... which falls in a pool of gasoline... which leads back
to the car... which goes kaboom!  And we see Porter, through the smoke,
staring at the wreckage.  It's a cool moment in a cool movie, and it's
absolutely silent.  (Except for the kaboom.) Gibson doesn't have to say
anything, not even a Schwarzeneggerian one-liner.  His cool is intact.
To make things even better, Payback is a movie where uncommon coolness is a
common virtue.  Maria Bello is supercool as Porter's hooker girlfriend, but
she's easily outstripped (chuckle) by Lucy Alexis Liu's sadomasochistic
hooker-with-a heart-of-barbed-wire.  The gangsters are just as cool, with
William Devane, James Coburn, and Kris Kristofferson all contributing to
the movie's ice-cold spirit.
The only real drawback to Payback was the two girls who sat behind me and
related plot points to each other the whole way through the movie.  I am
pleased to say that I resisted temptation and let this antisocial behavior
pass without resorting to violence or even an unkind word or two.  I hope,
however, that the Presidential Summit to Prevent Unnecessary Talking In
Movie Theaters gets underway soon.  It's time for Washington to lay off the
entertainment business for awhile and take an interest in the real problems
our country faces.

Author
Brandon Stahl
Payback (* 1/2 out of four)
Starring Mel Gibson, Maria Bello, Kris Kristofferson
Written by Donald E. Westlake, adapted from the novel The Hunter, written by
Richard Stark
Directed by Brian Helgeland
It seems that I've stopped enjoying movies that should be fun to
watch. Take Payback, for example, a movie that most people seem to
like. However, It's horrible schlock, straight out of hollywood's vast
talent for sucking creativity out of movies. It was written and
directed by a guy who should have done better; however, maybe he did
do better, after all, 30 percent of the movie isn't his own. Mel
Gibson, that hollywood zombie, decided he didn't like the ending and
had another director reshoot it. What a crock. If you sign on to do a
movie, then do it the way the script calls for. Why film a movie and
then look at it later and say, - No, I changed my mind, I don't like
the ending. You're fired. Let's get someone else to do it. - I suppose
honor is dead in Hollywood.
The end of the film is, of course, hollywoodized. Which is to say that
it's happy and the guy you root for beats impossible odds to win his
prize. In this case, as is most victories in Hollywood movies,
Gibson's prize is a blond and money. I miss originality in film, I
really do. I think audiences are so starved for it that they'll flop
down a lot of money in hopes that a movie will be original. Payback's
tagline - Get ready to root for the bad guy - promised an original
idea, but it was far from the truth. While Gibson's character
certainly broke the law, he was a character that had honor (odd that
Gibson himself seems to have very little of it), wouldn't kill in
front of children and protects his blond woman. There's nothing bad
about him - he's a hollywood character, a person who could never exist
in real life. And Gibson knows it - he spends his time trying to act
like a "bad guy", and instead comes off as pretentious and arrogant.
The story involves Gibson being double-crossed by his partner (who is
a real bad guy, which made me wish that we could root for him) over
$70,000. Gibson recovers from multiple gunshots, is pissed
(naturally), and will do whatever it takes to get the exact amount of
money back - no more, no less. He makes a point of it that it's
strictly 70 grand. A real bad guy would have made his ex-partner pay
25% interest. This idea is completely stretched out.  Gibson ends up
going after his partner and the Chicago mafia that his partner is
affiliated with. What I didn't understand - this is the Chicago
mafia. $70,000 is like spare change to them. They'd probably just pay
the guy rather than go through the trouble of dealing with him. I
think they'd respect a guy going through this much trouble for a
simple $70,000.
Maybe I'm being too hard on the movie. Perhaps the filmmakers were
just trying to make a simple popcorn movie. I read Roger Ebert's
review and he liked Gibson in the role because he is a comic at heart
playing a bad guy.  That's why we're allowed to root for him. And it's
true - Gibson walks the movie as if he's smiling at a joke he just
heard. But he's wrong here. I wanted a Lee Marvin or old-time Clint
Eastwood or somebody who wasn't a comic, just an ass kicker.
As a side note, I've just checked the Internet Movie Database and
discovered that I am the 38th person to post a newsgroup review of
Payback. After this many reviews, why would anyone want to read this?
Really, I don't care. I'm just trying to gain membership into the
on-line film critics society by posting as many reviews as I can.

Author
Harvey S. Karten
 Reviewed by Harvey Karten, Ph.D.
 Paramount Pictures/Icon Productions
 Director:  Brian Helgeland
 Writer:  Terry Hayes, Brian Helgeland, novel "The Hunter" by
Richard Stark
 Cast: Mel Gibson, Maria Bello, James Coburn, William
Devane, Gregg Henry, Kris Kristofferson, Lucy Alexis Liu,
David Paymer, Deborah Unger, Sterling Wolfe, Jean Carol,
Bill Duke
   The tagline for this taut, violent, swiftly-paced and
thoroughly captivating movie is "Get ready to root for the bad
guy."  Now, that's not too unusual--after all the villains always
get the best lines and make the heroes look really good. 
This time around, you root for the trigger-happy scrapper
because of all the macho men in the show he's the one with
the choice reason to use his weapons: justifiable revenge. 
Porter (Mel Gibson), the hero- villain of Brian Helgeland's
"Payback," is much more than an oxymoron.  He's one of the
most exciting naughty boys to come along in a while, wearing
his outrage on his sleeve the way a much cooler James Bond
would flaunt the golden cufflinks on his Perry Ellis shirt.
   "Payoff" is an update of a noir thriller, John Boorman's 
1967 tingling "Point Blank," which was somehow shunted
aside by critics and audience alike at the time but which
became elevated to classic stature to such an extent that it
was featured at the recent New York Film Festival to wide
acclaim.  In Boorman's work--based like the current one on a
novel by Donald E. Westlake writing as Richard Stark--a
mobster (played by Lee Marvin) completes a successful
robbery only to be double-crossed by his wife and his partner,
shot and left for dead.  When he recovers from his serious
wounds, he is intent on re-capturing his share of the money,
not a penny more, but his real motive is revenge.
   This fresh version is situated in Chicago, which
photographer Ericson Core bathes in a blue hue.  With
Mel Gibson's occasional narration and Chris Boardman's
moody soundtrack, we're plunged into the episode
briskly, at a pace that barely has time for a few romantic
breaks.  Director Helgeland prefers to have the fists and guns
do most of the talking.  From the very beginning, we're
into Porter's perspective.  He is flat on his back, a nasty
bullet wound patched up by a seedy, back-alley medic who
pours half a bottle of booze on the affront before extracting
the bullet.  A flashback takes us to the source of the wound.
Porter plans a heist with the evil-looking Val (Gregg Henry)
and his wife Lynn (Deborah Kara Unger), which involves
crashing his car head-on against one driven by
money-launderers.  Porter's devil-may-care bearing
is apparent: he notes in planning the robbery that the Asian
gangsters who regularly carry a case filled with cash do not
wear seat belts.  Score one for the educational value of the
film.
   While "Payback" is one of the most violent movies in recent
years, exploiting an honest fury and brutality which is treated
merely as tongue-in-cheek by Quentin Tarantino in "Pulp
Fiction," it may not strike its audience in quite the same way
that its predecessor did.  In 1967, the wide screen had only
recently become a household word with moviegoers, and
"Point Blank" director Boorman exploited the advancement by
tossing his villains from one end of the frame to the other. 
Buildings bulged from their foundations in much the manner
used by Alex Proyas for his startlingly graphic "Dark City." 
Boorman's soundtrack often faded to silence as would a pop
orchestra out to highlight certain vocal passages.  Odd
camera angles and fractured time lines inflected the story. 
Helgeland, who gave Mel Gibson an overwritten script as a
motor-mouth, paranoid cabbie in "Conspiracy Theory" and
who regained his reputation writing the stunning police drama
"L.A. Conspiracy," has embraced sheer violence to replace
the cinematic techniques of "Point Blank."  In doing so he as
squandered much of the elegance of the 1967 drama but has
banking on Mel Gibson's audience appeal, a tough guy for
whom we root despite his theft of a few dollars from an
allegedly crippled homeless man.  Watch especially the
activities of Pearl (Lucy Alexis Liu), a high-priced hooker with
a bent for extreme sado-masochism.  How often do you see
a small solidly built woman make her living from hanging
willing clients upside down in their bedrooms and smashing
them in the face when they speak out of turn?  Or smiling
broadly when a criminal sends a splintering blow across her
mouth, causing her to lick her blood as though it were a
dollop of tiramasu?
